Mortgage Registry Tax Manual September 2003 Minnesota Department of Revenue 600 North Robert Street St. Paul Minnesota 55146 651-296-0298
1
Mortgage Registry Tax
Table of Contents Major Terms ...........................................................
2 Mortgage ..........................................................
Real Property ...................................................
Personal Property .............................................
Secure ..............................................................
Mortgagor and Mortgagee ...............................
Principal Debt or Portion of Debt ....................
Lien ..................................................................
2 3 5 5 7 7 8 Mortgages Exempt from the Tax .........................
20 Statutory Exemptions ....................................
Corrective Mortgages ....................................
Replacement Mortgages ................................
Future Advances: Property Protection ...........
Mtg.
Amendments: Debt Not Increased ........
Extension of a Mtg.: Debt Not Increased ......
Assignment of a Mortgagee's Interest ...........
Assignment of Rents: Mtg.
Amendment .......
Mtg.
Pursuant to a Divorce Decree................
Fraternal Benefit Societies.............................
Federal Government ......................................
20 21 21 22 22 23 23 23 24 25 26
Basis and Rate of Tax.............................................
8 Mortgages Subject to the Tax.................................
9 Introduction......................................................
9 Supplemental Mortgages ...............................
10 Extension of a Mtg.: Debt Not Increased ......
11 Assignment of a Mortgagor's Interest ...........
12 Assignment of Rents: First Mortgage ............
12 Future Adv.: Predetermined Lump Sum ........
13 Future Adv.: Revolving Line of Credit ..........
13 Future Adv.: Undetermined Amount .............
14 Mortgages Securing Bonds ............................
14 Mortgages with Deferred Interest ..................
15 Reverse Mortgages ........................................
17
Bankruptcy Mortgages .........................................
26 Multi-County Mortgages......................................
28 Multi-State Mortgages .........................................
30 Agricultural Conservation Fee .............................
32 Administrative Procedures ...................................
33 Appendix ..............................................................
34 Minnesota Statute Chapter 287......................
35 Affordable Housing Loans ............................
47 Agricultural Loans .........................................
50 Quick Reference Guide ........................................
52
2
Mortgage Registration Tax Major Terms Mortgage What type of document or written instrument is subject to the mortgage registration tax (MRT)? The MRT law defines the term "mortgage" as follows: (Italics added) "...Any instrument, including a decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made under it, creating or evidencing a lien of any kind on real property, given by an owner of real property as security for a debt, notwithstanding that the debt may also be secured in part by a lien upon personalty."
(M.S. 287.01, Subd. 6) The key principles contained in the above definition of a mortgage are outlined below.
1.
A MORTGAGE IS EXECUTED AS PART OF A LOAN AGREEMENT.
A mortgage is one of two major instruments that may be used in a loan agreement.
The other instrument is a promissory note.
A promissory note is a written instrument given by the borrower to the lender.
It contains the provisions of the loan and a promise to pay the debt according to the terms of the agreement.
The terms usually include the principal amount of the debt, the interest rate, and the time and method of the payment.
The total amount that must be paid under the terms of the note is usually referred to as the total debt obligation, indebtedness, or loan obligation.
A promissory note is not a mortgage.
It merely serves as evidence of a debt for which a mortgage may be given as security.
2.
A MORTGAGE GIVES REAL PROPERTY AS SECURITY FOR A DEBT The purpose of a mortgage is to secure the payment of a debt as evidenced by a promissory note.
The security is the borrower's real property.
The total debt, as evidenced by a promissory note, does not need to be secured entirely by real property.
However, real property must secure at least part of the total debt in order for the document or written instrument to be a mortgage.
Without real property as security, there can be no mortgage.
3.
A MORTGAGE CREATES A LIEN ON REAL PROPERTY In Minnesota, a mortgage secures the payment of a debt by creating a lien on the borrower's real property.
If the borrower does not pay the debt as secured by the mortgage, the lender may enforce the lien by foreclosing on the real property as described in the mortgage.
The foreclosure authorizes the sheriff to seize and sell the real property.
As a result of the sale, the lender will usually receive at least the amount of the unpaid debt.
Without the creation of a lien, there can be no mortgage in Minnesota.
A well-drafted mortgage will include the following basic information or components.
1.
Names of the principle parties: mortgagee (lender) and mortgagor (borrower).
2.
Language indicating that the instrument is given as security for a debt that is evidenced by a promissory note.
3.
Language stating the amount of the principal debt that is secured by the mortgage.
4.
Language stating the amount of any future advances secured by the mortgage, if any.
5.
Legal description of the real property given as security for the repayment of the debt as evidenced by a promissory note.
6.
Language requiring the payment of all interest, taxes, special assessments, insurance, and the maintenance and repair of the real property.
7.
Legal action allowed upon default of the terms of the mortgage, usually the right to foreclose on the real property to collect the unpaid debt.
8.
Conditions for the satisfaction of the mortgage and the release of the lien.
For purposes of the MRT in Minnesota, all mortgages may be subdivided into two categories: Minnesota mortgages and multistate mortgages.
3
1.
A mortgage that secures a debt with real property located only in Minnesota is called a Minnesota mortgage.
2.
A multistate mortgage is a mortgage that secures a debt with real property located in Minnesota and in one or more other states.
Multistate mortgages may secure a portion of the debt by use of the limiting clause from M.S. 287.05 Subd. 1a or by using the ratio method.
SUMMARY: The type of document or written instrument that is subject to the MRT is a mortgage.
A mortgage secures the payment of a debt as evidenced by a promissory note.
A mortgage secures the payment of a debt by giving the lender a lien on the borrower's real property.
A mortgage is the only type of document or written instrument that is subject to the MRT; however, a document may be a mortgage even if it is not labeled as such or even if the word "mortgage" does not appear anywhere in the document.
pipe lines, milk cooling tanks, and commercial/industrial attached machinery.
5.
Unaccrued Rents: Future payments that must be made for the possession and use of buildings and/or land under a long-term lease agreement.
By law, a borrower must hold a type of ownership in real property with a conveyance document that may be recorded in the county recorder's office or the office of the registrar of titles.
The MRT law (M.S. 287.01, Subd. 9) says: "Real property," "real estate," and "land," in addition to the meaning thereof contained in chapter 500, include all interests in real property that can be conveyed by a document, which may be recorded."
(Italics added) Examples of Real Property Ownership and Conveyance Documents Real property has several types of ownership rights that are guaranteed and protected by the government.
More than one person or organization may own the same piece of real property at the same time.
Each one may also hold a different type of ownership.
One or more of the owners will hold the highest form of ownership.
The other owners will hold lesser forms of ownership.
In Minnesota, a mortgage is defined as any written document that creates a lien on these various types of real property ownership for the purpose of securing the payment of a debt.
Examples of some of the types of real property ownership and some of the types of conveyance documents are listed below.
A borrower may theoretically give a mortgage to secure a debt with any of these types of real property ownership.
In practice, the lender will decide what type of real property ownership will be accepted as security for the payment of a debt.
Some forms of real property ownership are more attractive to lenders than others.
1.
Legal Title: This is the highest form of ownership.
The legal title gives the owner the full bundle of rights and responsibilities, including possession, use, sale, and maintenance.
This type of ownership may be held or conveyed with a warranty deed, a
Real Property According to the mortgage registration tax (MRT) law, a document must pledge real property located in Minnesota as security for the payment of a debt in order for the document to be a mortgage and be subject to the MRT.
In the words of the MRT law itself (M.S. 287.035): "The tax rate is .0023 of the debt or portion of a debt that is secured by any recorded mortgage of real property located in this state."
(Italics added) Examples of Real Property 1.
Land: Crop lands, pastures, woods, lakes, marshes, fields, meadows, yards, vacant lots, and minerals located underground.
2.
Vegetation: Trees, shrubs, bushes, grass sod, and farm crops growing on the land.
3.
Buildings or Structures: Factories, warehouses, stores, skyscrapers, houses, townhouses, condominiums, garages, barns, silos, grain bins, fences, posts, poles, and towers.
4.
Permanent Attachments: Light fixtures, plumbing, heating and air conditioning, builtin microwave ovens, built-in gas grills, softwater conditioners, hot-water heaters, barn stalls, barn cleaners, silo unloaders, milking
4
limited warranty deed, or a quitclaim deed.
A borrower may give a mortgage to secure a debt with the legal title to real property.
Most lenders prefer the legal title because it is the highest form of ownership.
It is the most common type of real property ownership given to secure the repayment of a debt with a mortgage.
2.
Equitable Title: This is a limited form of ownership.
An equitable title gives the owner the right to receive the legal title only upon the completion of certain conditions.
Examples of parties who might hold an equitable title to real property are the vendee (buyer) under a contract for deed and the mortgagee (lender) under a mortgage.
3.
Contract for Deed: The vendor (seller) under a contract for deed technically holds the legal title.
In reality, the vendor's ownership is more like a lien interest.
In other words, the vendor holds legal title merely as security for the payment of the purchase price.
During the life of the contract, the vendor's type of ownership may be mortgaged.
When the contract is paid off, legal title must generally be conveyed to the vendee free of any liens or encumbrances incurred by the vendor, usually by a warranty deed.
4.
Contract for Deed: The vendee (buyer) under a contract for deed holds an equitable title.
The vendee has the legal right to possess, use, and control the property.
This right may be canceled only if the vendee defaults on the terms of the contract.
The vendee's ownership may be mortgaged unless prohibited by the terms of the contract.
After payment of the last installment, the vendee generally has the right to receive the legal title free of any liens or encumbrances incurred by the vendor,usually by a warranty deed.
5.
Lease: The lessor (landlord) conveys a leasehold estate to the lessee (tenant) with a long-term lease of real property.
During the life of the lease, the lessor gives up temporary possession and use of the real property but retains the legal title.
The lessor may mortgage the real property held with the legal title.
During the life of the lease, the lessor also has the legal right to collect the unaccrued rents.
The unaccrued rents are defined as real property.
The lessor may also create a
mortgage lien on the unaccrued rents.
When the lease expires, the leasehold estate is dissolved, and the lessor recovers the right of possession and use of the real property.
6.
Lease: The lessee (tenant) receives a leasehold estate from the lessor (landlord) with a long-term lease of real property.
During the life of the lease, the lessee has exclusive possession and use of the real property.
This right may be canceled only if the lessee defaults on the terms of the lease.
The lessee's ownership of the leasehold estate may be mortgaged unless prohibited by the terms of the lease.
After the lease expires, the lessee loses the leasehold estate, and the right of possession and use of the real property reverts to the lessor.
7.
Life Estate: Any party who holds the legal title to real property may convey the property to another party and retain a life estate.
The holder of the life estate is called the life tenant.
In most cases, the life tenant has the right to possess, use, and control the real property for as long as the life tenant lives.
The life tenant's ownership of the life estate may be mortgaged.
However, the mortgagee's interest in the real property would terminate with the death of the life tenant.
8.
Life Estate: Any party who holds the legal title to real property may convey the property to another party and retain a life estate.
The party to whom the property is conveyed usually holds the legal title subject to the life estate.
In this case, the party is called the remainderman.
The remainderman usually does not have the right to possess, use, and control the real property until the death of the life tenant.
The remainderman's ownership of the real property may be mortgaged.
However, the mortgagee's interest in the real property is subject to the life estate.
SUMMARY: A mortgage must give real property located in Minnesota as security for a debt in order for the mortgage to be subject to the MRT.
Examples of real property are land, vegetation, buildings or structures, permanent attachments, and unaccrued rents.
Real property consists of several types of ownership rights that are guaranteed and protected by the government.
The following types of real property ownership may be
5
mortgaged: legal title, equitable title, contracts for deed, mortgage, leasehold estate, and life estate.
6.
All movable equipment and machinery used in commercial and industrial operations.
Intangible personal property refers to rights and interests; e.g., patents, franchises, and copyrights.
SUMMARY: The payment of a debt may be secured by personal property and real property.
However, the creation of the lien on the real property is what makes the security document or written instrument a mortgage.
Personal property is not involved in the determination of the MRT.
Personal Property According to the mortgage registration tax (MRT) law, a loan or debt that is secured by a lien on real property may also be secured in part by a lien on personalty (personal property).
As stated in M.S. 287.01, Subd. 6, a mortgage is: "...Any instrument, including a decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made under it, creating or evidencing a lien of any kind on real property, given by an owner of real property as security for a debt, notwithstanding that the debt may also be secured in part by a lien upon personalty."
(Italics added) However, it is the creation of the lien on the real property that makes the instrument a mortgage.
The personal property is not involved in the determination of the MRT.
According to M.S. 287.035, the tax rate is .0023 of the debt or portion of the debt that is secured by any recorded mortgage of real property located in this state.
(Italics added) In general, "personal property" refers to everything that is the object of ownership except real property.
Personal property can be divided into two categories: tangible and intangible.
Tangible personal property refers to material things that are movable.
Some common examples:.
1.
Refrigerators, freezers, portable microwave ovens, portable room heaters, washers, dryers, television sets, stereo systems, and pool tables.
2.
Sofas, upholstered chairs, TV recliners, dining room sets, lamp tables, lamps, hutches, dinette sets, dressers, bureaus, and desks.
3.
Dairy cattle, beef cattle, horses, sheep, goats, pigs, farm crops, and pet-shop animals.
4.
Lawn mowers, snow blowers, tractors, grain combines, and other farm machinery.
5.
Personal computers, printers, copiers, typewriters, word processors, filing cabinets, and office desks and chairs.
Secure This term refers to the key purpose of a mortgage: to secure the repayment of a loan or payment of a debt with real property located in Minnesota.
This basic principle is established in two sections of the MRT law: 1.
287.01, Subd. 6: "...Any instrument, including a decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made under it, creating or evidencing a lien of any kind on real property, given by an owner of real property as security for a debt, notwithstanding that the debt may also be secured in part by a lien upon personalty."
(Italics added) 2.
287.035: "The tax rate is .0023 of the debt or portion of a debt that is secured by any recorded mortgage of real property located in this state."
(Italics added) Not all loans evidenced by a promissory note are secured.
Sometimes a lender will advance funds on the basis of the borrower's character and reputation.
If the borrower defaults, the lender must sue under the promissory note and try to obtain a court judgment against the borrower's assets.
Under a favorable judgment, the lender may be able to seize and sell the borrower's property or garnishee the borrower's wages.
In any case, unsecured loans are potentially more risky and expensive for the lender.
The lender's risk is reduced when the borrower's personal property, real property, or both secure a debt evidenced by a promissory note.
If the total debt is not paid, the lender has the legal right to enforce the loan agreement or agreements in order to recover the amount of the unpaid debt.
The
6
following is a summary of each of these types of security and how they relate to the MRT. 1.
Debt Secured by Personal Property A lender may accept various types of personal property to secure the payment of a debt as evidenced by a promissory note.
The personal property is referred to as collateral.
In order to establish a security interest in collateral, the lender and borrower may sign a security agreement as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code (UCC).
A separate UCC-1 Financing Statement may also be signed by the lender and borrower.
These documents are usually filed in the county recorder's office in order to establish the lender's timely security interest in the collateral.
Upon default, the lender may have the collateral seized and sold to satisfy the unpaid debt.
With a security agreement or a UCC-1 Financing Statement, a security interest in personal property is given as security for the payment of a debt.
Because it does not give any real property as security, a security agreement or UCC-1 Financing Statement is not a mortgage.
Each of them may be recorded without paying the MRT.
For example, the Hollywood Video Shop in Applewood, Minnesota borrows $25,000 from the Applewood State Bank.
The bank requires the video shop to sign a promissory note, agreeing to repay the loan with interest over a 15-year period.
The Video Shop is also required to sign a security agreement.
The security agreement gives the bank a security interest in the Video Shop's personal property valued at $75,000.
The bank may record the security agreement without paying any MRT. 2.
Debt Secured by Real Property Historically, lenders have preferred mortgages because they secure a loan with at least some real property.
Most of the time, a mortgage secures a debt or portion of a debt with the borrower's legal title to real property.
A legal title means that the borrower holds the highest form of ownership with a warranty deed, a limited warranty deed, or a quitclaim deed.
Legally, a mortgage may also secure a debt or portion of a debt with the borrower's equitable title to real property.
An equitable title gives the borrower the right to receive the legal title only upon the completion of certain conditions.
When it does give real property located in Minnesota as security for the payment of a debt or portion of a debt, a mortgage is subject to the MRT unless otherwise exempt by statute.
The basis of the MRT is the principal debt or portion of a debt secured by the mortgage.
For example, the Heritage Dental Center in Applewood, Minnesota borrows $45,000 from the Applewood State Bank.
The bank requires Heritage to sign a promissory note, agreeing to repay the loan with interest over a 15-year period.
Heritage is also required to give the bank a mortgage on the Dental Center's real property (buildings and land) valued at $150,000.
Heritage's mortgage is intended to secure payment of the total obligation as evidenced by the promissory note and the mortgage.
The total obligation includes the $45,000 loan, interest, and taxes and insurance that can be added to the mortgage debt if not paid by Heritage.
Although the mortgage secures the total obligation, only the $45,000 principal debt is subject to the MRT. 3.
Debt Secured by Both Real and Personal Property A lender may demand a security interest in the borrower's personal property and a mortgage on the borrower's real property.
This may be done with a separate security agreement and UCC-1 Financing Statement for the personal property and a separate mortgage for the real property.
It may also be completed in a single document.
The single document is called a "Mortgage and Security Agreement and Fixture Financing Statement."
It is most often used to secure commercial loans.
This single document functions as a mortgage, a security agreement, and a UCC-1 Financing Statement.
It gives the borrower's real property as security, grants a security interest in the borrower's personal property, and serves as a fixture financing statement.
The term "fixture" refers to the permanent attachments to the buildings and other structures.
In short, the document gives all of these types of properties as security for payment of the debt.
If there is default, the lender may foreclose on the real property, including the fixtures, and may seize and sell the personal property in order to recover the unpaid debt.
As a mortgage, the document is
7
subject to the MRT.
The basis of the MRT is the principal debt or portion of a debt that is secured by the mortgage.
SUMMARY: In order to be subject to the MRT, a document must secure the principal debt or portion of the debt with the borrower's real property located in Minnesota.
The document may also secure the debt with personal property.
However, it is the action of securing the debt with the borrower's real property that makes the document a mortgage and triggers the MRT.
instrument is a promissory note.
A promissory note contains the provisions of the loan and a promise to repay according to the terms of the agreement.
Terms include the amount of the loan, the interest rate, and the time and method of repayment.
The second instrument is a mortgage.
A mortgage may secure the payment of the total obligation owed under the terms of the promissory note and the mortgage.
A mortgage may secure more than one promissory note.
The total obligation may include the following amounts: (1) the principal debt; (2) future advances; (3) the interest on the loan; (4) the cost of insurance, taxes, and maintenance that may be added to the debt if not paid by the borrower; and (5) attorney fees and other costs incurred to enforce the loan agreement.
A mortgage may secure the total obligation as defined above, but the total obligation is not subject to the MRT.
The total obligation is not the basis of the MRT.
The basis of the MRT is never more than the principal debt or portion of a debt.
Under the MRT law, the principal debt or portion of a debt includes only certain parts of the total obligation secured by the mortgage.
Minnesota Mortgages May Secure Portion of the Debt As of 1999, a Minnesota mortgage may secure either the principal debt or a portion of the debt.
There are situations where the lender and borrower may choose to draft a Minnesota mortgage that secures only a portion of the debt.
For example, they may want to do this when the value of the real property is less than the principal debt as evidenced by the promissory note and the Minnesota mortgage.
In this case, they may want the Minnesota mortgage to secure only the portion of the debt that is equal to the value of the real property.
Of course, this means that the remainder of the total debt will not be secured by the Minnesota mortgage.
For a Minnesota mortgage to secure only a portion of the debt, the following clause or its equivalent must be on the first page of the mortgage: "Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, enforcement of this mortgage is limited to a debt amount of $.........under chapter 287 of Minnesota Statutes."
(M.S. 287.05 Subd. 1a)
Mortgagor and Mortgagee In most cases, the mortgagor is the borrower or the party who receives the loan in any mortgage transaction.
For purposes of the MRT, "mortgagor" usually refers to the borrower (debtor) who gives the mortgage as security for the payment of a debt as evidenced by a promissory note.
The mortgagee is the lender or the party who gives the loan in any mortgage transaction.
"Mortgagee," for purposes of the MRT, usually refers to the lender (creditor) who takes the mortgage as security for the payment of a debt as evidenced by a promissory note.
Principal Debt or Portion of the Debt NOTE: The 1999 legislative session changed the mortgage registration tax to allow for the securing of a portion of the debt for both Minnesota and multistate mortgages.
This is done by use of the limiting clause as specified in M.S. 287.05 Subd 1 and 1a.
Dollar Basis of the MRT According to the MRT law, the dollar basis of the MRT is the principal debt or portion of a debt secured by a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
The term "dollar basis" means the numeric value on which the MRT is to be charged.
M.S. 287.035 says: "The tax rate is .0023 of the debt or portion of a debt that is secured by any recorded mortgage of real property located in this state."
(Italics added) PRINCIPAL DEBT OR PORTION OF A DEBT IS ONLY PART OF THE TOTAL OBLIGATION SECURED A mortgage is one of two major instruments that may be used in a loan agreement.
The other
8
For a multistate mortgage to secure only a portion of the debt the following clause or its equivalent must be on the first page of the mortgage: "Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, enforcement of this mortgage in Minnesota is limited to a debt amount of $............
under chapter 287 of Minnesota Statutes."
(M.S. 287.05 Subd. 1(a))
Basis and Rate of Tax The MRT is to be imposed on the recording of the mortgage document.
"Record," "recorded," and "recording" each mean that a document has been delivered to and filed in the office of the county recorder or registrar of titles, whichever office maintains the records for the real property described in the document.
(M.S. Section 287.01, Subd. 10) The two statutes quoted below indicate that a mortgage subject to the MRT cannot be recorded until the tax is paid.
"The tax imposed by sections 287.01 to 287.12 must be paid to the treasurer of any county in this state in which the real property or some part is located at or before the time of filing the mortgage for record."
(M.S. 287.08(a)) "A mortgage, or documents relating to its foreclosure, assignment, or satisfaction must not be recorded unless the tax has been paid."
(M.S. 287.10) If the mortgage is exempt from taxation the endorsement shall, in substance, be "exempt from registration tax."
(M.S. 287.08(a)) The date of recording is determined in one of two ways: (1) the date when the mortgage is presented in person at the county offices for recording, or (2) the postmarked date if the mortgage is mailed in to the county offices for recording.
If a mortgage subject to tax is recorded without payment of tax, that mortgage may not be received as evidence in court and does not serve as notice, except as provided in M.S. 582.25.
(M.S. 287.10)
Lien By law, a mortgage gives the lender a lien on the borrower's real property as security for repayment of a loan or payment of a debt.
According to M.S. 287.01, Subd. 6, a mortgage is: "...Any instrument, including a decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made under it, creating or evidencing a lien of any kind on real property, given by an owner of real property as security for a debt, notwithstanding that the debt may also be secured in part by a lien upon personalty."
(Italics added) In general, the term "lien" has been defined as a legal claim that one party holds against another party's property.
The purpose of a lien is to provide security for the payment of a debt or for the completion of some action involving a financial obligation.
As part of a loan agreement, the lender may take a lien on the borrower's personal property, real property, or both.
Principal Debt of Portion of the Debt The dollar basis of the mortgage registration tax (MRT) is the amount of the principal debt that is secured by a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
Note that this may be a portion of the total amount of the principal debt.
The following key points should be kept in mind when determining the amount of the principal debt or portion of the debt for the MRT.
9
1.
The principal amount of the debt secured by a mortgage is the dollar basis of the tax, not the value of the real property put up as security for the debt.
2.
The principal amount of the debt secured by a mortgage is the dollar basis of the tax, not the interest or other required payments for the loan.
(Op.Atty.Gen., 12/21/79) 3.
The principal amount of the debt secured by a mortgage is the dollar basis of the tax even if the real property is only a part of the total collateral put up by the debtor to secure repayment of the debt.
In summary, the principal amount of the debt that is secured by a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota is the dollar basis of the MRT.
THE PRINCIPAL DEBT AMOUNT IS TO BE TAXED ONLY ONCE.
The tax is to be charged only once on any specific principal debt amount secured by a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
For example, if the tax is paid on a Minnesota mortgage, no additional tax is due on any extension of that mortgage, unless the original principal debt amount is increased.
(M.S. 287.04(c)) NOTE: The above rule is valid for extensions, amendments, and supplements only if the original mortgage remains in existence and is not satisfied.
(Op.Atty.Gen., 418b-18, 8/23/67) The dollar basis of the MRT is the amount of principal debt secured by a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
"Dollar basis" means the numeric value on which the MRT is to be charged.
The goal is always the same: to search through the major components of a mortgage and discover the amount of the principal debt that is secured by the mortgage.
Rate: .0023 of Principal Debt (Hennepin and Ramsey County Rate = .0024) The rate of the mortgage registration tax (MRT) is set at .0023 of the principal debt or portion of a debt that is secured by any recorded mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
The tax rate to charge is the rate that is in effect on the date when
the mortgage is presented for recording.
(M.S. 287.035; 287.08; 287.10) FORMULA FOR COMPUTING THE MRT: (PRINCIPAL DEBT or PORTION of DEBT) X .0023 ( Hennepin/Ramsey = .0024)
Mortgages Subject to Tax Introduction If all of the basic principles listed below apply to any mortgage presented for recording, the mortgage is subject to the MRT. 1.
The mortgage must have been executed by a mortgagor and delivered to a mortgagee.
2.
The mortgage must be given as security for a debt probably evidenced by a promissory note.
3.
The mortgage must create a lien on real property located in Minnesota as security for a debt.
4.
The mortgage must contain a legal description of the real property located in Minnesota.
5.
The mortgage must state the amount of the principal debt secured by the mortgage.
6.
The mortgage must state that it secures future advances, if they will be made in the future.
A mortgage usually secures the payment of the total obligation owed under the terms of a promissory note and the mortgage.
Of course, a mortgage may secure more than one promissory note.
The total obligation may include the following amounts: (1) the principal amount of the note(s); (2) future advances; (3) the interest on the loan; (4) insurance, taxes, and maintenance; and (5) attorney fees and other costs incurred by the mortgagee to enforce the loan agreement(s).
A mortgage typically secures the payment of the total obligation, but the total obligation is not subject to the MRT.
The basis of the MRT is the principal debt or portion of the debt.
The basis of the MRT would include the following: (1) the principal amount of the note OR a stated portion of the note if a limiting clause as directed in M.S. Section 287.05 Subd 1 or 1a is used; and (2) future advances (if any).
10
When the principal debt or portion of the debt has been determined, the final step is to calculate the amount of the MRT that must be paid and collected before the mortgage may be recorded.
Supplemental Mortgages Minnesota Property Only A mortgage supplement increases the debt of an original Minnesota mortgage and is subject to the mortgage registration tax (MRT) whether or not additional security is provided.
(M.S. 287.04; 287.05, Subd. 2(a)) Since a supplemental mortgage increases the debt secured by an original Minnesota mortgage, it is subject to the MRT.
The basis of the MRT is the amount of the increase in the secured debt.
The standard tax rate is charged on the full amount of increase in the principal debt secured by real property in Minnesota.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2) Op.Atty.Gen., 418-B-7, March 27, 1942; 418b-12, March 16, 1967; 418b-18, August 23, 1967.
NOTE: ORIGINAL MORTGAGE MUST NOT BE SATISFIED For a document to qualify as a supplemental mortgage, the original mortgage being supplemented must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
If the original mortgage is satisfied, the old debt obligation and lien are extinguished.
Instead of increasing the original debt, the new mortgage creates a distinct and independent debt obligation and lien.
As a result, the principal debt secured by the new mortgage (for example, any outstanding original debt and any increase to the original amount) is subject to the MRT. (Op.Atty.Gen., 418b-18, August 23, 1967)
Minnesota mortgages.
(M.S. Section 287.05 Subd. 1(a) and 1a(a)) To supplement a mortgage using the limiting clause, a person only needs to include the limiting clause on the front of the supplement.
The amount in the limiting clause would be the total amount of the debt secured by the Minnesota property.
The basis of the MRT on the supplement would be the positive difference, if any, remaining after the current outstanding amount of the original debt secured was subtracted from the amount of debt secured with the supplement.
The ratio method is required if the limiting clause is not used.
The following three methods of supplementing a mortgage show the process using the ratio method.
A supplemental mortgage that increases either the debt secured by Minnesota property or the percentage of the real property encumbered by the mortgage located in Minnesota as compared to the original mortgage is subject to additional mortgage registration tax (MRT).
The additional tax is triggered by any of the following conditions contained in the supplemental mortgage: (1) an increase in the debt secured by Minnesota property, (2) an increase in the percentage of the real property encumbered by the mortgage being located in Minnesota, or (3) both an increase in the debt secured by Minnesota property and an increase in the percentage of the real property under the mortgage being located in Minnesota.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2) The three conditions are discussed in the following examples.
A. DEBT SECURED BY MINNESOTA PROPERTY IS INCREASED With the ratio method, the additional debt is taxed at the ratio of the fair market value of the real property located in Minnesota to the total fair market value of all the real property described in the mortgage.
"Except for an amendment or a revision to a reverse mortgage as described under subd 6, any document that alters an existing mortgage by providing for an increase in the amount of debt secured by real property located in this state... shall be taxed based upon the increase in the amount of the debt determined to be secured by
Supplemental Mortgages: Multi-state For documents recorded or registered prior to July 1, 1999 the only way to calculate the MRT on a multi-state mortgage was by using the ratio method.
The tax due because of a supplement to a multi-state mortgage also had to be calculated using the ratio method.
The 1999 legislative session changed this requirement with the addition of a limiting clause for both multi-state and
11
real property located in this state ..."
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2 ) For a new mortgage to qualify as a supplemental mortgage, the original mortgage, being amended must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
B. PERCENTAGE OF PROPERTY IN MINNESOTA IS INCREASED AND RATIO METHOD IS USED When a supplemental mortgage on real property located across state lines increases only the percentage of the value of the real property located in Minnesota, compared to the total value of the real property, but the original principal debt is not changed, an additional tax may be due.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2(b)) The additional tax is based on the remaining outstanding balance of the original debt multiplied by the difference between the percentage of the value of the Minnesota property to the total in the supplemental mortgage and the percentage in the original mortgage.
Fair market value is to be used to determine the percentages.
"Except for an amendment or a revision to a reverse mortgage as described under subdivision 6, any document that alters an existing mortgage by providing for an increase ... in the percentage of Minnesota real estate as compared to the total real estate that is encumbered by the mortgage, shall be taxed based upon the increase in the amount of the debt determined to be secured by real property located in this state ..."
M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2.
An additional tax would be due on a supplemental mortgage using the limiting clause only if the amount of the debt secured by the Minnesota real property increases.
Once again, an example of a Minnesota-Iowa farm loan can be used here.
Only two major changes are needed: (1) add 100 acres used as additional security be located in Minnesota, and (2) remove the new loan as part of the supplemental mortgage.
This would increase the percentage of the value of the Minnesota property compared to the total value of the property and would require an additional tax to be computed according to the above formula.
C. BOTH DEBT AND PERCENTAGE ARE INCREASEDAND THE RATIO METHOD IS USED When a supplemental mortgage on real property located across state lines increases both the remaining balance of the original debt and the percentage of the value of the Minnesota real property compared to the total value of the real property, two additional tax amounts must be computed.
One additional tax is computed on the increase in debt using the revised percentage of Minnesota security (Step A. above).
The other additional tax is computed on the remaining balance of the original debt using the increase in percentage of Minnesota security (Step B. above).
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2) "Except for an amendment or a revision to a reverse mortgage as described under subd 6, any document that alters an existing mortgage by providing for an increase in the amount of debt secured by real property located in this state, or, in the case of a multistate mortgage described in subd 1, paragraph (b), an increase in the percentage of Minnesota real estate as compared to the total real estate that is encumbered by the mortgage, shall be taxed based upon the increase in the amount of the debt determined to be secured by real property located in this state ..."
M.S. 287.05, Subd. 2.
For a new document to qualify as a supplemental mortgage, the original mortgage must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
Extension of Mortgage: Debt Not Increased For documents recorded or registered after July 1, 1999, an extension of an original Minnesota mortgage or multistate mortgage is defined as a document that does not increase the amount of secured debt.
An extension of a mortgage is one of the methods of amending an original mortgage.
Generally, it is used to extend the term of payments.
An extension may occur from a change in the interest rates or a change in the monthly payment amount that requires the term of the mortgage to be extended.
To qualify as an extension, a mortgage must meet the following three requirements: (1) the new mortgage must contain a reference to the original mortgage; (2) the original mortgage must remain in existence and not be satisfied; and (3) the
12
outstanding balance of the debt secured by the mortgage must not be increased.
For a new document to qualify as an extension, the original mortgage, which is amended must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
If the original mortgage is satisfied, the old debt obligation and lien are extinguished.
Instead of merely changing one or more of the terms of the original mortgage, the new document creates a distinct and independent mortgage and lien.
As a result, the debt secured by the new mortgage (outstanding balance of the original debt and any newly secured debt) is subject to the MRT. (Op.Atty.Gen., 418b-18, August 23, 1967)
Mr. David decides to make some improvements to the house.
The bank lends Mr. David $15,000 to pay the contractor.
Mr. David assigns $15,000 of his equity interest in the house to the bank as security for the new loan.
Tax of $34.50 is due on the total principal debt of $15,000 when the second mortgage is presented for recording at the county offices.
Assignment of Rents: First Mortgage A mortgage assigning unaccrued rents on real property in Minnesota is subject to the mortgage registration tax (MRT).
The basis of the tax is the debt amount that is secured by the rents, if all of the real property is located in Minnesota.
With this type of security for an existing debt, the mortgagor agrees to assign legal rights to collect unaccrued rents on real property to the mortgagee.
A mortgage assigning rents can function as a first mortgage if the original contract was not a mortgage.
For example, if the original contract was a promissory note for a cash loan that did not create a lien on real property as security, it was not a mortgage.
The original contract would not have been subject to the MRT.
A mortgage assigning rents is subject to the MRT because it secures a debt with real property.
Legally, "unaccrued rents" are defined as part of real property or land.
Key points about a mortgage assigning rents, which makes it subject to the MRT: 1.
The original contract was not a mortgage; (e.g. it was a promissory note.)
2.
The mortgage assigning rents secures the debt.
3.
The MRT is due on the debt secured by the mortgage assigning rents.
If a supplement to a mortgage assigning rents later increases the amount of debt secured under that mortgage, additional MRT would be due on the increase as is the case for other mortgages.
M.S. 287.01, Subd. 3; Op.Atty.Gen., 6/7/74.
Assignment of Mortgagor's Equity Interest The assignment of a mortgagor's equity interest in real property in Minnesota as security for a new debt is subject to the mortgage registration tax.
The basis of the tax is the total new secured debt, which is secured by the assignment of a mortgagor's equity interest in real property if all of the real property given as security is located in Minnesota.
When a mortgagor has earned equity in real property, which was purchased with a mortgage, the equity may be used as security for a new loan by assigning interest in the equity.
Because this is new security for a new indebtedness, a mortgage registration tax is due on the full amount of the new debt, even though the original mortgage was recorded and that tax paid.
In practice, the assignment of a mortgagor's interest is the same as a second mortgage.
Example: Assignment of a Mortgagor's Interest In 1996, Gary David buys a house for $50,000 with a $10,000 cash down payment and gives a mortgage for the $40,000 balance.
The MRT is paid.
By 2001, the house is worth $80,000.
Mr. David's equity in the house is worth about $45,000: $30,000 from inflation, $10,000 down payment, and $5,000 in payments.
13
Example: Mortgage Assigning Rents The Fidelity Paper Corporation obtains a $1,000,000 loan from the Anderson Finance Corporation.
Fidelity signs a promissory note for the loan as the major contract agreement with Anderson.
In addition to the promissory note, Anderson Finance requires Fidelity to put up real property as security for the loan.
Fidelity owns buildings leased by the Middleton Shopping Center, Inc.
Under the 99-year lease agreement, Middleton is required to pay a monthly rent to Fidelity.
Anderson Finance agrees to accept a mortgage from Fidelity Paper assigning the unaccrued rents as security for the principal debt of $1,000,000.
The mortgage gives Anderson the right to collect the rents up to the balance of the debt that is not otherwise paid by Fidelity Paper.
The mortgage functions as a guarantee that Anderson will be repaid for the $1,000,000 loan to Fidelity Paper.
When Anderson presents the mortgage to the county for recording, the treasurer's office charges a MRT of $2,300.
The basis of the MRT is the debt of $1,000,000 because the mortgage assigning rents is securing that debt amount.
The $2,300 MRT must be paid before the mortgage that assigns rents as security for a debt can be recorded at the county recorder's office.
M.S. 287.01, Subd. 3; Op.Atty.Gen., 6/7/74.
First, the debt can be set up as a lump-sum payment in the future.
The basis of the MRT is the debt, even though it will be disbursed in the future.
The tax is to be charged at the time of recording, even though the loan will be received later.
Second, the loan agreement can be written so that part of the debt is disbursed at the time of the signing and the rest as a lump-sum future advance.
The basis of the tax is the maximum debt amount under the mortgage agreement--the part received at the signing and the part received later.
At the time of recording, the tax is to be charged on the maximum debt amount, even though part of the loan will be given to the borrower at a later date.
In summary, MRT is due on the predetermined, lump-sum, future advance at the time of recording, no matter when the maximum debt amount (i.e. loan) is disbursed.
M.S. 297.05, Subd. 3 and 5
Future Advance: Revolving Line of Credit A mortgage that creates a lien on real property located in Minnesota as security for a maximum revolving line of credit is subject to the mortgage registration tax (MRT).
The basis of the tax is the maximum amount of the line of credit as authorized in the mortgage regardless of the time or amount of advances, payments, or re-advances.
The maximum credit allowed at any time under the revolving plan constitutes the debt secured by the mortgage.
As stated in M.S. 287.05, Subd. 3: "When a mortgage, including a reverse mortgage, secures a revolving line of credit under which advances, payments, and readvances may be made from time to time, the tax imposed under section 287.035 must be paid on the maximum amount of the line of credit that may be secured at any one time, as expressed in the mortgage, regardless of the time or amount of advances, payments, or readvances."
At the time of recording, MRT is due on the maximum amount of credit allowed under the mortgage agreement even though the mortgagor may never draw the maximum amount.
Future Advance: Predetermined LumpSum A mortgage creating a lien on real property located in Minnesota as security for a predetermined lumpsum future advance (loan) is subject to the MRT.
The basis of the tax is the maximum amount of the future advance allowed by the agreement and secured by a mortgage.
The standard tax rate is to be charged on the full amount of the future advance if all of the real property given as security is located in Minnesota.
There are two ways that a mortgage can be written to authorize a predetermined, lump-sum, future advance.
14
Future Advance: Undetermined Amount A mortgage that creates a lien on real property located in Minnesota as security for an undetermined future advance (loan), is subject to the mortgage registration tax (MRT).
The basis of the tax is the total amount of the future advance once the exact amount is known.
The standard rate of the tax is to be charged on the full amount of future advance if all of the real property given as security is located in Minnesota.
According to M.S. 287.05, Subd. 5, when a mortgage secures an indeterminate amount other than those described in subd 3 (revolving line of credit), 4 (advances by mortgagee), or 6 (reverse mortgages), no tax shall be paid at the time the mortgage is recorded, but the tax must be paid at the time of recording an affidavit or other document stating the amount and time of the actual advance.
The key difference between a predetermined and an undetermined future advance is the time when the tax is charged.
When the future advance is predetermined, the tax is due at the time of the recording.
If the future advance is not known, the tax cannot be paid at the time of the recording.
Instead, the payment of the tax is delayed until an affidavit is filed certifying the amount and time of the actual future advance.
Some counties require that an affidavit certifying intent to make a future advance be filed when the mortgage is recorded.
This gives the county an official record of the pending transaction and a reminder of a future MRT to be paid when the exact amount is known.
M.S. 287.05, Subd. 5 Example: Undetermined Future Advance LMT Properties, Inc., a corporation located in Minnesota, completes negotiations with the Mississippi Finance Corporation.
Mississippi Finance agrees to loan LMT Properties $500,000 immediately, and to provide future advances as required for a construction project.
A promissory note is signed for the debt amount.
In addition to the note, a mortgage creating a lien on real property in Minnesota owned by LMT Properties is given to Mississippi Finance as security for repayment of the $500,000 loan, and for all advances issued with other notes in the future.
When any future advances are made, a clause in
the mortgage requires LMT Properties to (1) sign a promissory note as requested by Mississippi Finance, and (2) pay or reimburse Mississippi Finance for all fees and costs, including any MRT due on the future advances which increase the debt secured by the mortgage on record.
When the mortgage is presented for recording, the county treasurer charges a MRT of $1,150, which is based on the debt of $500,000.
Six months later, LMT Properties requests an additional loan of $250,000, the first future advance.
A promissory note is signed for the loan, which is secured by the mortgage on record.
A few days later, Mississippi Finance files an affidavit with the county treasurer's office certifying the additional loan of $250,000.
The county treasurer charges a MRT of $575 on the total $250,000 as an additional debt secured by the mortgage on record.
Under the terms of the mortgage agreement, LMT Properties is responsible for reimbursing Mississippi Finance for the $575 MRT.
Mortgages Securing Bonds A mortgage that creates a lien on real property located in Minnesota as security for repayment of bonds or other obligations is subject to the mortgage registration tax.MRT under M.S. 287.04.
(M.S. 287.05 Subd. 7) The basis of the MRT is the total amount of the bond issue or other obligations, excluding all interest.
The standard MRT rate is to be charged on the total amount of the bond issue or other obligations if all of the real property given as security is located in Minnesota.
There are two situations where the MRT is due on a mortgage securing bonds or other obligations.
They are explained and illustrated in examples A and B, below.
As used below, "bond" will refer to the combined phrase "bonds or other obligations."
A. BONDS ISSUED AS STATED IN MORTGAGE In this situation, a mortgage is written to secure the payment of bonds that have been issued in the past or will be issued in the future.
The total amount of
15
the bond issue is known when the mortgage is completed and presented for recording.
At the time of the recording, an affidavit should be attached to the mortgage stating the amount of the bonds already issued or to be issued later.
The basis of the MRT is the total amount of the bond issue listed on the affidavit.
According to M.S. 287.05 Subd 7: "If a mortgage is made to a mortgagee in trust to secure the payment of bonds or other obligations yet to be issued, a statement may be incorporated in the mortgage stating the amount of the obligations already issued or yet to be issued, and the tax to be paid on filing the mortgage for recording must be computed upon the amount so stated."
B. BONDS ISSUED IN EXCESS OF AMOUNT STATED IN MORTGAGE In this situation, a mortgage is written to secure the payment of bonds, which have been issued in the past or will be issued in the future.
The total amount of the bond issue, in either case, is known when the mortgage is completed and presented for recording.
However, for whatever reason, the bond issue actually made is more than the amount stated on the affidavit.
This also means that the debt (the actual bond issue) is more than the amount on which the MRT was paid.
As stated in M.S. 287.05 Subd 7: "The statement must be binding and conclusive upon all persons claiming through or under the mortgage, and no such obligation issued in excess of the aggregate so fixed is valid for any purpose unless the additional tax is paid and receipted by the proper county treasurer."
The intention of M.S. 287.05 Subd 7 seems clear.
An additional MRT must be paid on the increase in the bond issue.
The increase is the excess above what was known when the mortgage was completed and presented for recording.
The county treasurer must collect and certify the payment of the additional MRT before the excess bond issue has any legal validity.
The increase in the bond issue is handled similar to the issuance of future advances that are
undetermined when a mortgage is recorded.
M.S. 287.05 Subd 5 requires the MRT to be paid on the amount of future advances when they are actually made in the future.
Likewise, M.S. 287.05 Subd 7 requires the MRT to be paid on the amount of any bonds issued in the future in excess of the amount on which the MRT was paid when the mortgage was recorded.
Failure to pay the additional MRT on either the future advances or excess bond issue will result in the mortgage being legally invalid for that amount.
Mortgages with Deferred Interest A mortgage that creates a lien on real property located in Minnesota as security for a debt that may be increased by deferred interest is subject to the mortgage registration tax (MRT).
The basis of the tax is the debt that is the sum of the original loan amount plus the total deferred interest allowed over the life of the mortgage.
The standard MRT rate is to be charged on the debt if all of the real property given as security is located in Minnesota.
In relation to mortgage loans, the term "interest" is defined as the compensation paid by the borrower to the lender for the use of the lender's money.
In most cases, the interest on a mortgage loan is set at a fixed rate.
The amount of interest paid is generally not included in determining the MRT.
An exception to the general rule is the flexible-rate mortgage.
As the name implies, the interest rate on a flexible-rate mortgage is not fixed.
Instead, the interest rate is flexible.
The mortgagee is allowed to adjust the interest rate, upward or downward, in response to short-term money market conditions.
Several federal and state regulations place limitations or caps on the flexibility of the interest rates.
One type of regulation limits the amount that the interest can be increased over the life of the loan.
A second regulation places a cap on the amount that the interest rate can be adjusted in any one-payment period.
A third regulation restricts the amount that the periodic payment can increase.
A possible result of these regulations which affects the MRT is called negative amortization.
Negative amortization occurs when a capped periodic payment is not enough to cover all of the accrued interest on a flexible-rate loan.
When this happens,
16
the payment of the excess interest is deferred and capitalized.
This means that the unpaid interest is added to the balance of the debt still due.
The deferred interest is paid later when the monthly payments can be increased under the terms of the mortgage agreement.
Most flexible-rate mortgages contain a provision limiting the amount of the deferred interest to a specific percentage of the original debt.
For example, some financial institutions limit the total amount of interest that can be deferred to 25 percent of the original debt.
Because it increases the original debt, the deferred interest is subject to the MRT.
The tax on a flexible-rate mortgage is based on 100 percent of the original debt plus the percentage of the original debt that the deferred interest is limited to over the life of the loan.
The formula for calculating the basis of the MRT on a flexible-rate mortgage is outlined below.
TAX BASE = DEBT x (100% + PERCENTAGE OF DEBT ALLOWED AS DEFERRED INTEREST) EXAMPLE: DEBT x (100% + 25% MAXIMUM DEFERRED INTEREST) DEBT OF $100,000 x 125% = $125,000 TAX BASE $125,000 TAX BASE x $0.0023 TAX RATE = $287.50 MRT The total MRT on a flexible-rate mortgage is due at the time of the recording when the mortgage states the maximum percent of the original debt that is allowed as deferred interest over the life of the loan.
MORTGAGES SECURING DEFERRED INTEREST WITHOUT A MAXIMUM PERCENT A mortgage that allows the original debt to be increased by deferred interest does not have to contain a maximum percentage.
This means that deferred interest may be added to the original debt over the life of the loan without any limitation.
With this type of mortgage, the total dollar amount of the deferred interest allowed over the life of the loan cannot be known at the time the mortgage is presented for recording.
As a result, the extra MRT cannot be calculated and collected on the deferred interest at the time of recording.
However, the total amount of this deferred interest is subject to the MRT.
How should the MRT due on this deferred interest be paid and collected? The only practical answer is to tax this type of deferred interest in the same way that "indeterminate future advances" are taxed under M.S. 287.05, Subd. 5.
At the time of the mortgage foreclosure or satisfaction, the parties involved must draft an affidavit, stating the total amount of deferred interest that was added to the original debt over the life of the loan.
They must present the affidavit to the county treasurer and pay the MRT on the total amount of deferred interest that was added to the original debt.
The county treasurer must endorse payment of the MRT on the affidavit.
The affidavit must be recorded as part of the original mortgage.
In order to make the MRT plan legally part of the original mortgage, the drafters should be required to include a paragraph in the original mortgage, explaining the MRT plan and certifying that they will comply with the MRT plan.
This can be done when the original mortgage is drafted or by adding an exhibit or amendment to the original mortgage before it is recorded.
EXAMPLE: MORTGAGE WITH DEFERRED INTEREST Lawrence and Shirley Zenith buy a house for $56,000.
They pay $12,000 down in cash and obtain a$44,000 loan from the Rivers Mortgage Corporation.
The company requires the Zeniths to sign a promissory note for $44,000.
As security for the $44,000 promissory note, the Zeniths are required to give Rivers a mortgage on the house.
The mortgage is for 30 years with an annual interest rate of 9.85 percent.
The Zeniths also sign a rider to the mortgage agreement that sets up a flexible-rate interest program for repayment of the note.
The terms of the rider are part of the mortgage creating a lien on
17
the house as security.
Under the rider, the interest rate on the mortgage loan can not rise higher than 16.5 percent or drop lower than 6.5 percent.
The rider also gives the Zeniths the option to limit the amount of new monthly payments to the equivalent of a 1 percent interest rate increase.
If they exercise the option and the limited monthly payments are not high enough to cover the unpaid balance of the debt in full, the excess interest must be added to the unpaid balance of the debt.
The rider does protect the Zeniths by stating that the total interest deferred cannot exceed 25 percent of the original debt of $44,000.
In other words, the total deferred interest included in the unpaid balance on which the monthly payments are based cannot exceed $11,000 over the course of the loan.
When the mortgage with the attached rider is presented for recording, the county treasurer's office charges a MRT of $126.50.
The tax is based on the debt of $55,000 secured by the mortgage on the house: 100 percent of the $44,000 original debt plus 25 percent of the original debt as the maximum interest allowed to be deferred.
The basis of the tax = $44,000 X 125% = $55,000.
A reverse mortgage usually offers the following payment plans: (1) a lump sum, (2) monthly payments for as long as the borrower lives in the home, (3) monthly payments for a fixed period of time, (4) a maximum line of credit, or (5) a combination of monthly payments and a maximum line of credit.
There can be any number of variations or combinations of the above plans.
In Minnesota, reverse mortgages are offered by private lenders alone and by private lenders who are participating in the FHA/HUD program which is insured by the federal government.
Reverse mortgages sponsored by FHA/HUD are called home equity conversion mortgages.
TAXABLE VERSUS EXEMPT A reverse mortgage taken by a private lender is subject to the MRT whether or not the private lender participates in the FHA/HUD program.
Under FHA/HUD, there are two reverse mortgages.
The first mortgage, which is taken by the private lender, is subject to the MRT.
The second mortgage, which is taken by FHA/HUD, is exempt from the MRT under M.S. 287.04.
COUNSELING FOR FHA/HUD PROGRAM
Reverse Mortgages Overview A reverse mortgage is designed mainly for senior homeowners who are short of cash for daily or emergency expenses but have substantial assets tied up in their homes.
As the name implies, a reverse mortgage works backwards.
Under a traditional home mortgage, the borrower agrees to make periodic payments to the lender until a loan is paid off.
With a reverse mortgage, the lender agrees to make periodic payments to the borrower, and the loan does not have to be repaid until a later time.
The maximum amount which can be borrowed by a homeowner under a reverse mortgage is usually determined by the following factors: (1) the borrower's age, (2) the value of the home, (3) the loan costs, and (4) the payment plan.
The 1991 legislature required all borrowers to complete a counseling course before entering into a reverse mortgage contract under the FHA/HUD program.
Senior Housing, Inc., a branch of the Minnesota Senior Federation, is certified to provide the counseling in Minnesota.
(M.S. 47.58, Subd. 8, as amended by Laws 1991, Chapter 201, Section 1) As part of the counseling requirement, all lenders must keep certificates on file documenting that each borrower received the counseling course.
MRT DUE AT TIME OF RECORDING The MRT is to be paid at the time of recording or registering the original reverse mortgage.
The original reverse mortgage cannot be recorded or registered without payment of the MRT. (M.S. 47.58, Subd. 6) The payment of the MRT on the original reverse mortgage cannot be deferred until the actual
18
payments are made in the future as it can be for a traditional mortgage with an indeterminate amount of secured debt.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 5) REVERSE MORTGAGES ARE NOT SUPPLEMENTAL MORTGAGES BASIS OF THE TAX The secured debt or obligation under a reverse mortgage is the expected total disbursements (or cash equivalent) which will be made throughout the course of the reverse mortgage.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 6) The expected total disbursements include the sum of all cash advances paid to the borrower, plus any costs financed in the mortgage instead of being paid out-of-pocket by the borrower at the closing.
Costs that can be financed in the mortgage include: (1) property appraisal, (2) title search and insurance, (3) county recording fees, (4) the MRT, (5) home insurance and taxes, (6) origination fee, (7) mortgage insurance premiums, (8) monthly or annual servicing fees, and (9) interest.
Under a reverse mortgage taken by a private lender not participating in the FHA/HUD program, the basis of the MRT is the expected total disbursements minus interest costs.
Under a reverse mortgage taken by a private lender participating in the FHA/HUD program, the basis of the MRT is the expected total disbursements minus interest costs, FHA mortgage insurance premiums, and monthly lender service fees.
Because all of the factors are not broken out in the mortgage document, the county treasurer will have to rely upon the lender to certify the estimated amount of expected total disbursements subject to the MRT and the exact amount of the MRT due on each mortgage.
Minnesota lenders who take reverse mortgages have agreed to include specific language on the mortgage document clearly indicating the basis of the MRT and the amount of the MRT due.
This language is usually on the bottom of the first page, and is generally in the line of: "Mortgage Registration Tax Amount: $...
" This is the amount that the MRT would be based on.
EXAMPLE: PRIVATE LENDER ONLY Mrs. Edna Roebuck is 72 years old and lives alone.
She fears that she will have to sell her house if any financial emergencies arise.
Her house is worth about $78,000, and the mortgage is paid up.
She calls Northeast State Bank, a reverse mortgage lender.
Northeast does not participate in the FHA/HUD program.
After approval was granted, Northeast wrote a reverse mortgage to fit Mrs. Roebuck's situation.
The expected total disbursements were set at $56,500.
Mrs. Roebuck could request future cash advances until the total of her advances plus the standard closing costs, interest accruals, property taxes, insurance costs, and MRT reached $56,500 or for 10 years, whichever came first.
Mrs. Roebuck mortgaged security for repayment of the additional costs listed have to be paid until Mrs. home or until the 10-year whichever comes first.
her house to Northeast as all future advances plus above.
The debt does not Roebuck leaves her period expires,
Northeast certified on the mortgage that the basis of the MRT was $32,372 (the expected total disbursements of $56,500 minus an estimated interest cost of $24,128).
This is the basis of the MRT even though Mrs. Roebuck may not receive the total amount because the MRT is to be imposed on the debt, which is secured or may be secured by the mortgage.
Northeast also certified on the mortgage that the MRT due was $74.52 ($32,372 divided by 100 X $0.23).
The county treasurer collected the $74.52 along with the other fees and the mortgage was recorded.
EXAMPLE: FHA/HUD PROGRAM Mrs. Catherine Mallory is 75 years old and lives alone.
Her house is worth $100,000 and is free and clear of any mortgage lien.
Mrs. Mallory's social security is not enough to pay her expenses.
Mrs. Mallory decided to call Wayne-Capital Mortgage Corporation, a participant in the FHA/HUD program.
Wayne-Capital told her that she had to do two things before a FHA/HUD reverse mortgage could be approved.
First, she had
19
to complete a counseling program at Senior Housing, Inc., a branch of the Minnesota Senior Federation.
Second, she had to fill out an application form and provide the following information: (1) proof of age, (2) social security number, (3) property tax receipt, (4) house insurance policy, and (5) proof of ownership.
After approval was granted, Wayne-Capital wrote a first and a second FHA Home Equity Conversion Mortgage (reverse mortgage) to fit Mrs. Roebuck's situation.
The language of both mortgages was almost identica, except that Wayne-Capital was the mortgagee on the first mortgage and the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development was the mortgagee on the second one.
Wayne-Capital entered the following factors into the FHA/HUD computer program to determine the terms of Mrs. Mallory's loan.
The first factor entered was the number 75 for her age.
The second factor was 10 percent which was the current estimate of what interest rates are likely to average during the course of the loan.
The third factor was $100,000, which represented the "maximum claim amount" or the current appraised value of Mrs. Mallory's house.
The fourth factor was the closing costs as defined by FHA/HUD.
The closing costs, to be financed in Mrs. Mallory's mortgage, included FHA mortgage insurance premiums of $2,000, lender's service fees of $2,672, and the $1,500 origination fee.
This fee covered the appraisal, title search, inspections, and credit report.
The final factor entered was a "T," for tenure.
This indicated that Mrs. Mallory had chosen to receive a monthly payment for as long as she continued to live in her house.
Using the above factors, the principal limit for Mrs. Mallory's mortgage was set at $41,600.
The principal limit is the current maximum permissible mortgage balance.
During the loan, the principal limit increases each month at a rate equal to 1/12th of the sum of the expected interest rate and the annual rate of the monthly insurance premiums.
The computer program also set the amount of the monthly payment plan at $346.
Under the first mortgage, Wayne-Capital is required to pay Mrs. Mallory $346 a month until she leaves her house or
until the loan balance equals the maximum claim amount of $100,000.
The latter is estimated to take place in about 11 years.
If she leaves the house before the $100,000 maximum claim amount is reached, Mrs. Mallory (or her estate) would be required to pay WayneCapital the lesser of the loan balance or the sale price of the house.
FHA/HUD guarantees to reimburse Wayne-Capital for any amount of the loan balance that is greater than the sale price of the house.
On the other hand, if Mrs. Mallory remains in the house after the $100,000 maximum claim amount is reached, Wayne-Capital would be able to assign the first mortgage to FHA/HUD.
HA/HUD would pay Wayne-Capital the $100,000 maximum claim amount, and the first mortgage would be satisfied.
Under the second mortgage, FHA/HUD is required to pay $346 a month to Mrs. Mallory until she leaves her house.
At that point, Mrs. Mallory (or her estate) would be required to pay FHA/HUD the lesser of the $100,000 maximum claim amount or the sale price of the house.
If the house has to be sold to pay off the debt and the sale price is less than the $100,000 maximum claim amount, Mrs. Mallory (or her estate) would not be required to pay FHA/HUD more than the sale price.
The federal government would have to absorb the loss.
If the house has to be sold to pay off the debt and the sale price is more than $100,000, the excess may be retained by Mrs. Mallory (or her estate).
The key point is that only the federal government can lose under a FHA/HUD reverse mortgage.
Wayne-Capital, the private lender, is guaranteed to receive the loan balance or the $100,000 maximum claim amount, regardless of the sale price of the house.
Mrs. Mallory (or her estate), the borrower, is guaranteed never to have to repay more than the sale price of the house, regardless of the amount received from Wayne-Capital and FHA/HUD.
The starting point for determining the MRT on the first reverse mortgage taken by Wayne-Capital is the principal limit.
For purposes of the MRT, the principal limit has been accepted as the equivalent of the expected total disbursements.
20
The actual basis of the MRT is called the principal debtor obligation.
It is equal to the principal limit minus the costs of the FHA mortgage insurance premiums and the lender service fees which are exempt from the MRT.
Interest costs are not subtracted because the actual interest charge is added to the principal limit later to arrive at the loan balance.
Wayne-Capital certified on Mrs. Mallory's first mortgage that the principal debtor obligation was $36,928 (the principal limit of $41,600 minus $2,000 for the FHA insurance premiums and $2,672 for the lender service fees which are exempt from the MRT).
They also certified on the mortgage that the MRT due was $85.10 ($36,928 divided by 100 X $0.23).
On Mrs. Mallory's second mortgage, WayneCapital certified "No MRT Due" because the second mortgage taken by FHA/HUD is exempt from the MRT. Wayne-Capital sent both mortgages to the county courthouse to be recorded.
The county treasurer collected the $85.10 MRT and the recording fees for the first mortgage and certified it for recording.
The second mortgage was certified for recording after collecting only the recording fees.
Mortgages Exempt from Tax Statutory Exemptions 1.
Any mortgage resulting from a decree of marriage dissolution(divorce decree) or an instrument made pursuant to it is exempt from the MRT under M.S. 287.04(a).
This includes a "summary real estate disposition judgement" under M.S. 287.01, subd. 4.
2.
Any mortgage that corrects a mistake in an existing mortgage is exempt from the MRT under M.S. 287.04(b).
(Corrective Mortgage) 3.
Any mortgage or other instrument that adds additional security for the same debt for which mortgage registry tax has been paid.
M.S. 287.04(c) 4.
Any form of a contract for deed is exempt from the MRT under M.S. 287.04(d).
5.
A mortgage secured by real property subject to the minerals production tax of sections 298.24 to 298.28.
M.S. 287.04(e) 6.
A mortgage loan made under a low and moderate affordable housing program, if the mortgagee is a federal, state, or local government agency.
M.S. 287.04(f) 7.
A mortgage granted by fraternal benefit societies subject to section 64B.24.
M.S. 287.04(g) 8.
A mortgage amendment or extension, as defined in section 287.01.
M.S. 287.04(h) 9.
A agricultural mortgage if the proceeds of the loan secured by the mortgage are used to acquire or improve agricultural property.
M.S. 287.04(I) Other mortgage related documents that are not subject to MRT.
  Any assignment of a mortgagee's interest in a mortgage is exempt from MRT.
Any assignment of rents or leasehold interests that is given as additional security for a debt or portion of a debt that is already secured by a mortgage is exempt from MRT.
Any amount of future advances that are paid by the mortgagee for the protection of the

21
mortgaged property and are secured by the mortgage are exempt.
M.S. 287.05, subd. 4.
 Any mortgage resulting from a Chapter 11 or Chapter 12 bankruptcy is exempt from the MRT under section 1146(c) of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.
Corrective Mortgages No mortgage registration tax (MRT) is due on a mortgage which corrects a mistake in an original mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
For administrative purposes, this type of document is referred to as a corrective mortgage.
M.S. 287.04(b) grants an exemption from the MRT for any mortgage given to correct a mistake in the legal description of the real property put up as security in an original mortgage.
Historically, this exemption has been extended to mortgages that make corrections in the language of an original mortgage besides the legal description.
The most common examples are (1) the spelling of the mortgagee's or mortgagor's name, (2) the address of the mortgagee or mortgagor, and (3) the legal signature of the mortgagee or mortgagor.
In general, any mortgage qualifies for exemption as a corrective mortgage as long as each of the four conditions, which are outlined below, are met.
1.
The original mortgage must be identified on the face of the corrective mortgage.
2.
The original mortgage must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
3.
The mortgage that makes the correction must be identified as a "corrective mortgage."
4.
The corrective mortgage must not increase the principal debt of the original mortgage.
NOTE: If a corrective mortgage increases the principal debt of the original mortgage, the amount of the increase is subject to the MRT.
To qualify as a replacement mortgage, nothing is to be changed in the original mortgage except the real property given as security for the principal debt.
The mortgagor and the mortgagee are to be the same parties.
The terms of the mortgage are to be the same.
Most important, the new mortgage must state that there is no additional debt.
If this fact is not stated in the mortgage, the county treasurer should require an affidavit certifying that there is no additional debt.
A replacement mortgage is usually executed because the mortgagor wants to clear the title on the real property given as security in the original mortgage.
The mortgagor may want to sell the property, and the buyer wants a clear title.
Therefore, the mortgagor has to remove the mortgage lien on the property before it can be sold.
M.S. 287.01, Subd. 2, clause (v) Example: Replacement Mortgage Donna Friedman sells her video rental business located in a small shopping center to Lance Marshall for $200,000.
Mr. Marshall pays her $100,000 as a down payment.
He obtains a loan from the Citizens State Bank for the other $100,000.
As security, the Citizens State Bank requires Mr. Marshall to give them a mortgage on two of his other video rental stores--video rental store #1 and video rental store #2.
At the closing, Mr. Marshall gives the bank a check for $230 to cover the MRT on the total principal debt of $100,000.
The mortgage is signed and notarized.
The bank pays the MRT with Mr. Marshall`s money, and the document is accepted for recording at the county offices.
A few weeks later, Mr. Marshall decides to sell video rental store #1.
Unfortunately, his potential buyer will not accept the property with a lien on it.
In order to get around the problem, Mr. Marshall persuades the Citizens State Bank to write a replacement mortgage.
The only difference between the two mortgages is an exchange of video rental stores as security for the original principal debt.
Video rental store #3 replaces video rental store #1.
When the replacement mortgage is presented for recording, the county treasurer stamps the
Replacement Mortgages No mortgage registration tax (MRT) is due on a mortgage executed for the purpose of replacing a parcel of real property given as security for an original mortgage with another parcel of real property.
(M.S. 287.01, Subd. 2, clause (v))
22
document "No MRT Due" and sends it to the county recorder's office to be recorded.
new mortgage must contain a reference to the original mortgage, and (2) the original mortgage must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
If an amendment provides additional security but does not increase the principal debt secured by an original mortgage, a mortgage amendment is not subject to the MRT. Op. Atty. Gen., 418-B-7, March 27, 1942; 418b-12, March 16, 1967; 418b18, August 23, 1967.
The MRT law distinguishes between amendments and supplements.
M.S. Section 287.01, Subd. 2 defines an amendment as "a document that alters an existing mortgage without securing a new debt or increasing the amount of an existing debt; and that does not, in the case of a multistate mortgage described in section 287.05, subd 1, paragraph (b), result in an increased percentage of the real property encumbered by the mortgage being located in this state.
Specifically, a document is considered an amendment to the extent it merely does any one or any combination of the following:     extends the time for payment of the unpaid portion of the original debt; changes the rate of interest applicable to the unpaid portion of the original debt; adds additional real property as security for the unpaid portion of the original debt; releases some but not all of the real property serving as security for the unpaid portion of the debt; replaces all the real property serving as security for the unpaid portion of the debt with other real property regardless of value; replaces a party previously bound by the mortgage with a new party who becomes bound by the same amended mortgages; or reduces the amount of the debt secured by real property located in this state, or in the case of multistate mortgages described in section 287.05, subd 1, paragraph (b), reduces the percentage of real property encumbered by the mortgage that is located in this state."
Future Advances: Property Protection No tax is due on any amount of future advances paid by the mortgagee for the protection of the mortgaged property.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 4) The protection of property includes the following situations: 1.
Taxes, assessments, or charges due on the property.
2.
Claims or fines imposed on the property.
3.
Premiums due to insure the property against damage or loss.
4.
Payments due on prior or superior mortgages or other liens or encumbrances.
5.
Legal expenses needed to maintain the property.
In most cases, the mortgage contract will contain clauses, which require the mortgagor to cover the expenses of the above situations in order to protect the mortgaged property.
However, if the mortgagor fails to meet this responsibility, the mortgagee may step in and advance or pay the money needed to protect the property.
When the mortgagee does make these types of future advances to protect the property, the payments are not to be defined as increases in the original principal debt secured by the mortgage.
The mortgagor may agree to pay back the mortgagee, but the extra money advanced to the mortgagor is not subject to an additional MRT. M.S. 287.05, Subd. 4.

Mortgage Amendment: Debt Not Increased No mortgage registration tax (MRT) is due on the recording of a mortgage amendment which does not increase the principal debt of the original mortgage.
(M.S. 287.01, Subd. 2; 287.04(h)) A mortgage amendment is one of the methods of amending an original mortgage.
It is generally used to provide additional security for a debt inadequately secured by an original mortgage.
In order to qualify as an amendment, a mortgage must meet the following two requirements: (1) the


23
Extension of a Mortgage: Debt Not Increased No mortgage registration tax (MRT) is due on the recording of an extension of an original mortgage of real property located in Minnesota if the extension does not increase the original principal debt.
(M.S. 287.01, Subd. 5; M.S. 287.04(h)) The exemption applies both to extensions to mortgages, which create a lien on real property located in Minnesota only and to extensions to mortgages on real property located across state lines.
M.S. Section 287.01, Subd. 5 defines extension as: "any document that alters an existing mortgage by extending the time for repayment without increasing the amount of debt secured by real property that is located in this state."
In order to qualify as an extension, a mortgage must meet the following two requirements: (1) the new mortgage must contain a reference to the original mortgage, and (2) the original mortgage must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
If the original mortgage is satisfied, the old debt obligation and lien are extinguished.
Instead of merely changing one or more of the terms of the original mortgage, the new mortgage creates a distinct and independent debt obligation and lien.
As a result, the total debt secured by the new mortgage is subject to the MRT. (Op.Atty.Gen., 418b-18, August 23, 1967)
The exemption applies to all mortgagee's and both Minnesota and multi-state mortgages.
A lending institution may choose to assign its mortgagee's interest in a mortgage for several reasons.
Maybe the current mortgagee needs cash and offers the mortgage to another lending institution at a discount.
Or maybe the other lending institution wants to purchase mortgages with good credit ratings and pays the current lending institution a bonus for theirs.
In either case, the terms of the original mortgage do not change.
The mortgagor's responsibility to continue making payments and fulfill any other requirements under the mortgage contract remains the same.
The only difference is the mortgagor is now making the payments to the new mortgagee instead of the former one.
Assignment of Rents: Mortgage Amendment No mortgage registration tax (MRT) is due on the recording of an assignment of rents which is given as additional security for a principle debt which is already secured by a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
(M.S. 287.04) With an assignment of rents, the mortgagor agrees to transfer the mortgagor's legal right to collect rents on real property to the mortgagee if the mortgagor defaults on the terms of the original contract.
It gives the mortgagee the legal right to collect the rents in lieu of the mortgagor's payments under the original contract.
A mortgage assigning rents can function as a first mortgage only when the original contract itself was not a mortgage.
For example, the original contract could be a promissory note for a cash loan, which did not create a lien on real property as security.
Because it was not a mortgage, the original contract was not subject to the MRT, and no tax was paid on the principal debt.
However, if the original contract was a mortgage creating a lien on real property as security, the original mortgage contract would have been subject to the MRT.
The MRT would have been paid on the total secured debt of the mortgage contract before the document could have been recorded.
Assignment of a Mortgagee's Interest No mortgage registration tax (MRT) is due on the recording of an assignment of a mortgagee's interest in a mortgage of real property located in Minnesota.
In other words, a mortgage is exempt from the MRT when the mortgagee (lender) assigns its interest in the mortgage to another party who assumes the role of the mortgagee.
(M.S. 287.01, Subd. 2, clause (vi)) M.S. 287.01, Subd. 2, clause (vi)) states: "...Specifically, a document is considered an amendment to the extent it merely does any one or any combination of the following: (vi) replaces a party previously bound by the mortgage with a new party who becomes bound by the same amended mortgage;"
24
In this case, a subsequent mortgage assigning rents would function as a mortgage amendment.
It would amend the first mortgage by putting up the rents as additional security for the same principal debt secured by the first mortgage.
And the MRT would have been paid on that principal debt.
Therefore, because it only provides additional security for the principal debt of an existing mortgage and does not increase that principal debt, a mortgage assigning rents as an amendment to an existing mortgage is not subject to the MRT. Op.Atty.Gen., 418B-12, March 16, 1967; and 474k, June 7, 1974 In summary:  The original contract is a mortgage that secures the principal debt with a lien on real property.
  The MRT was due on the original mortgage and paid.
The mortgage assigning rents provides additional security for the original principal debt.
The mortgage assigning rents does not increase the original principal debt.
The original mortgage must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
made pursuant to it which creates a lien on real property as security for a debt is considered a mortgage for purposes of the MRT law.
However, this type of mortgage is explicitly exempted from the MRT under M.S. 287.04(a).
SUMMARY REAL ESTATE DISPOSITION JUDGMENT The 1990 legislature created a new legal document to be used by a divorce court to convey its judgment and decree.
The document is called a Summary Real Estate Disposition Judgment (Summary).
(M.S. 518.191, Subd. 1-5 as added by Laws 1990, Chapter 575, Section 7) If a divorce decree includes a description of real property, the court may direct the parties to prepare a Summary.
The Summary operates as a conveyance and transfer of each party's interest in the marital real property according to the judgment of the divorce court.
It may, and in some cases must, be recorded in the county recorder's office or in the office of the registrar of titles.
The definition of a decree of marriage dissolution (divorce decree) includes a Summary for purposes of the MRT.
This means that a Summary, which creates a lien on real estate as security for a debt is to be treated the same as a divorce decree which does the same thing.
(M.S. 287.01, Subd. 4 and 6) As stated above, a divorce decree functioning as a mortgage is exempt from the MRT.
Under the new law, a Summary functioning as a mortgage is also exempt from the MRT. (M.S. 287.04(a)) Example: Mortgage From Divorce Decree As part of the distribution of marital property, the court orders Peter Rushmoore (husband) to sell the house owned in joint tenancy with his wife Denise.
The house is valued at $100,000.
The court also orders Peter to pay Denise $50,000 for her share of the house after the sale.
Denise executes a quit claim deed, conveying her share of the house to Peter so that he can sell it.
In order to ensure receipt of her share, Denise also requires Peter to give her a mortgage on the house for $50,000.
When Denise brings the mortgage in for recording, the county treasurer's office marks
 
In order for a new mortgage to qualify as a mortgage amendment, the original mortgage, which is being amended, must remain in existence and not be satisfied.
If the original mortgage is satisfied, the old obligation and lien are extinguished.
Instead of providing additional security for the original debt, the new mortgage creates a n independent debt obligation and lien.
As a result, the total debt secured by the new mortgage is subject to the MRT. (Op.Atty.Gen., 418b-18, August 23, 1967)
Mortgages Pursuant to a Divorce Decree No tax is due on the recording of a mortgage resulting from a decree of marriage dissolution (a divorce decree) or any instrument made pursuant to a divorce decree.
(M.S. 287.04(a)) DECREE OF MARRIAGE DISSOLUTION Under M.S. 287.01, Subd. 3, a decree of marriage dissolution (divorce decree) or any instrument
25
the document "No Tax Due" and tells her that she can record it without paying any MRT.
At the closing of the house sale, Denise receives a check for $50,000 from the buyer for her share of
the house.
This payment satisfies the mortgage and removes the lien on the house.
The other check for $50,000 goes to Peter for his share of the house.
Fraternal Benefit Societies The 2001 Minnesota Legislature added an exemption under M.S. 287.04(g) for mortgages granted by fraternal benefit societies subject to section 64B.24.
These organizations are certified by the Minnesota Department of Commerce as fraternal benefit societies under M.S. 64B.
The following organizations have been certified as fraternal benefit societies.
Mortgages given (borrower) by these organizations are exempt from MRT. 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
11.
12.
13.
14.
15.
16.
17.
18.
19.
20.
21.
22.
23.
24.
25.
26.
27.
28.
29.
30.
31.
32.
33.
34.
35.
36.
37.
38.
39.
40.
41.
42.
43.
* Aid Association for Lutherans ..................................................................................................
WI American Fraternal Union .......................................................................................................
MN American Postal Workers Accident Benefit Association .........................................................
NH American Slovenian Catholic Union ..........................................................................................
IL Catholic Aid Association ........................................................................................................MN Catholic Family Life Insurance .................................................................................................
WI Catholic Knights Insurance Society ..........................................................................................
WI Catholic Order of Foresters ........................................................................................................
IL Catholic Workman ..................................................................................................................
MN Croatian Fraternal Union of America ........................................................................................
PA CSA Fraternal Life .....................................................................................................................
IL Degree of Honor Protective Association .................................................................................
MN Equitable Reserve Association ..................................................................................................
WI First Catholic Slovak Ladies Association of the USA .............................................................
OH First Catholic Slovak Union of the USA and Canada ..............................................................
OH Greater Beneficial Union of Pittsburgh .....................................................................................
PA Greek Catholic Union of the USA ............................................................................................
PA Hibernian Life Insurance Fund of Minnesota .........................................................................
MN Independent Order of Foresters (The) ...........................................................................
CANADA Knights of Columbus ...............................................................................................................
CT Loyal Christian Benefit Association .........................................................................................
PA Lutheran Brotherhood .............................................................................................................
MN Mennonite Mutual Aid Association ...........................................................................................
IN Modern Woodsmen of America .................................................................................................
IL National Catholic Society of Foresters .......................................................................................
IL National Fraternal Society of the Deaf .......................................................................................
IL National Mutual Benefit ............................................................................................................
WI Police and Firemen's Insurance Association ..............................................................................
IN Polish National Alliance of the United States of North America ...............................................
IL Polish Roman Catholic Union of America .................................................................................
IL Polish White Eagle Association ..............................................................................................
MN Royal Neighbors of America ......................................................................................................IL Serb National Federation ...........................................................................................................
PA Slovene National Benefit Society..............................................................................................
PA Sons of Norway .......................................................................................................................
MN Travelers Protective Association of America ..........................................................................
MO Ukrainian National Association, Inc. ........................................................................................
NJ United Commercial Travelers of America (Order of) ..............................................................
OH United States Letter Carriers Mutual Benefit Association .......................................................
DC W.S.A. Fraternal Life ...............................................................................................................
CO Western Fraternal Life Association ............................................................................................
IA Woman's Life Insurance Society ..............................................................................................
MI Woodmen of The World Life Insurance Society*.....................................................................NE This company may also operate under the name of Omaha Woodmen Life Insurance Society.
26
Federal Government Mortgages are exempt if one of these entities is acting as either the mortgagor (borrower) or mortgagee (lender): Farm Credit Banks Agribank (i.e. Farm Credit Bank of St. Paul) AgAmerica Farm Credit Bank Farm Service Agency Commodity Credit Corporation Farm Housing Assistance Federal Financing Bank Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp.
("Freddie Mac") Federal National Mortgage Association ("Fannie Mae") Government National Mortgage Assoc.
("Ginnie Mae") National Consumer Cooperative Bank U. S. Small Business Administration(SBA) Federal Land Bank Associations Ag Star Financial Services, FLCA Ag Country Farm Credit Services, FLCA Mortgages are exempt if one of these entities is acting as the mortgagor (borrower): Federal Credit Unions Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.
Federal Reserve Banks Resolution Trust Corporations U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development U.S. Postal Service U.S. Rural Utilities Service(RUS) U.S. Rural Telephone Bank
Bankruptcy Mortgages Mortgages from Chapter 7, 9, and 13 Bankruptcy  Taxable.
Mortgage registration tax is due on a mortgage executed as part of a bankruptcy estate in all bankruptcy cases unless the mortgage is explicitly exempt under the federal Bankruptcy Code.
In practice, this means that the MRT must be charged on all mortgages executed in connection with the following bankruptcy cases: Chapter 7 (liquidation), Chapter 9 (municipal reorganization), and Chapter 13 (individual repayment plan).
Mortgages executed as part of a bankruptcy estate are not exempt from the MRT under the state MRT statutes--M.S. 287.01 to 287.13.
BANKRUPTCY DEEDS: TAXABLE STATUS UNDER FEDERAL LAW Mortgages executed as part of a bankruptcy estate are subject to the MRT under federal law unless the United States Congress has provided a specific exemption.
A federal law states the general principle of taxation in this way: "Any officers and agents conducting any business under the authority of a United States court shall be subject to all federal, state, and local taxes applicable to such business to the same extent as if it were conducted by an individual or corporation."
(28 U.S.C. Sec. 960) In 1989, a New York Bankruptcy Court applied the general principle of taxation to mortgages from bankruptcy: "Simply put, a debtor and its creditors, like everyone else, are subject to state and local taxation unless Congress has clearly provided an exemption."
(Amsterdam Avenue Development Associates, 103 B.R. 454 19 Bankr.
Ct. Dec. 1315) There are no special provisions in the federal Bankruptcy Code exempting mortgages in connection with bankruptcy estates under Chapter 7, Chapter 9, or Chapter 13 bankruptcy cases.
These mortgages are subject to the MRT.
27
CHAPTER 7: OVERVIEW Individuals, partnerships, and corporations are eligible to declare bankruptcy under Chapter 7.
This type of bankruptcy is usually chosen as a last resort.
Because of severe financial problems, the debtor is forced to liquidate all or most of its remaining assets in order to pay its creditors.
In most cases, the creditors are authorized to appoint a trustee in bankruptcy.
The trustee is responsible for transferring the debtor's assets into a bankruptcy estate, liquidating the assets, and distributing the proceeds to the creditors according to the priorities set up in the Bankruptcy Code.
Once this in completed, the trustee is required to file a final report with the bankruptcy court.
In the absence of a federal or state exemption and in the light of the above court cases, all mortgages executed in connection with a Chapter 7 bankruptcy case are subject to the MRT.
CHAPTERS 9 and 13: OVERVIEW For all practical purposes, the question of the MRT is academic for Chapter 9 and Chapter 13 because mortgages are seldom executed in accordance with these types of bankruptcy cases.
Chapter 9 allows insolvent municipalities to adjust their debts under a plan confirmed by the bankruptcy court.
Chapter 9 is seldom used because municipalities are encouraged to solve their financial problems without resorting to bankruptcy.
Even when Chapter 9 is used, it generally does not involve the execution of mortgages.
Chapter 13 allows individual wage earners and small businesses to formulate a workable plan to pay their creditors.
The plan requires the debtor to send a certain amount of its monthly income to a trustee and sets up a priority list for paying the creditors.
When the bankruptcy court confirms the plan, the trustee collects the money and distributes it to the creditors.
Chapter 13 usually does not involve the execution of mortgages.
Repeat: There is no special exemption under state or federal law for mortgages executed in connection with Chapter 9 and Chapter 13 bankruptcy cases.
Therefore, in the rare occasion
when a mortgage is executed as part of either of these two cases, it is subject to the MRT.
Mortgages from Chapter 11 and 12 Bankruptcy  Exempt.
No tax is due on the execution of a mortgage from the bankruptcy estate in a Chapter 11 (business reorganization) or Chapter 12 (family farm reorganization) bankruptcy case.
The exemption is based on a special tax provision in the federal Bankruptcy Code.
An explanation of the exempt status of mortgages executed under Chapter 11 and Chapter 12 is outlined below.
CHAPTER 11 and CHAPTER 12: OVERVIEW Individuals, partnerships, and corporations are eligible to declare bankruptcy under a Chapter 11 reorganization plan.
A similar reorganization plan is available for family farmers under Chapter 12.
Obviously, these two types of bankruptcy are preferable to Chapter 7 because the debtor is able to pay off its creditors and preserve its business or family farm.
In most cases, the debtor is allowed to operate its business or family farm and to function as the trustee during the bankruptcy proceedings.
In some cases, an independent trustee is appointed to oversee the actions of the debtor.
After the assets are transferred into the bankruptcy estate, the debtor designs a plan of reorganization.
The plan is a proposal to distribute some of the business or family farm assets to the creditors and preserve the rest for the debtor.
The debtor files the completed reorganization plan with the bankruptcy court.
The bankruptcy court holds a confirmation hearing to consider any objections from the creditors.
In order to be confirmed, the plan must assure that each creditor will receive at least the same amount in cash or property that it would receive under a Chapter 7 (liquidation) bankruptcy.
Once it is confirmed by the bankruptcy court, the plan is put into action.
The designated assets are distributed to the creditors according to the priority list in the plan.
And the remaining assets are retained by the debtor who continues to own and operate the business or family farm in the future.
28
CHAPTER 11 and CHAPTER 12: EXEMPTION UNDER FEDERAL LAW The U.S. Congress has provided a special tax provision exempting mortgages executed as part of a plan of reorganization under Chapter 11 and Chapter 12 bankruptcy cases.
Special Tax Exemption for Chapter 11 Mortgages According to Section 1146(c) of the federal Bankruptcy Code: "The issuance, transfer, or exchange of a security, or the making or delivery of an instrument of transfer under a plan confirmed under Section 1129 of this title, may not be taxed under any law imposing a stamp tax or similar tax."
Special Tax Exemption for Chapter 12 Mortgages According to Section 1231(c) of the federal Bankruptcy Code: "The issuance, transfer, or exchange of a security, or the making or delivery of an instrument of transfer under a plan confirmed under Section 1225 of this title, may not be taxed under any law imposing a stamp tax or similar tax."
Note: The Department of Revenue recommends that this federal exemption be granted to all mortgages under a Chapter 11 or Chapter 12 plan of reorganization.
VERIFICATION OF TAX EXEMPTION Before granting an exemption for any mortgage from a debtor or trustee in bankruptcy, the county officials should verify that the mortgage is from the bankruptcy estate in a Chapter 11 or Chapter 12 bankruptcy case.
Only mortgages from a Chapter 11 or Chapter 12 bankruptcy case are exempt from the MRT.
Multi-County Mortgages If the debt on a mortgage is greater than $1,000,000, the laws establish a special procedure for distributing the MRT on a mortgage that creates a lien on real property located in more than one county in Minnesota.
This type of mortgage is called a multi-county mortgage.
(M.S. 287.08) First, the mortgage's debt or obligation must be greater than $1,000,000.
Second, a mortgage is by definition a multi-county mortgage when it contains the legal descriptions of two or more parcels of real property located in two or more counties in Minnesota.
The procedures for distributing the MRT on multi-county mortgages are outlined below.
The total MRT is to be paid to the treasurer of the county where the mortgage document is first presented for recording.
This will be designated as the home county.
The county treasurer is to endorse payment of the MRT on the mortgage as usual.
The other recording procedures are to be completed, and the mortgage is to be recorded.
A copy of the original mortgage with the recording information may be recorded in the other county or counties without paying any additional MRT.
The total MRT is to be divided among the counties involved.
The division of the total MRT is to be based on the same ratio as the market value of the real property given as security in each county is to the market value of all the real property described in the mortgage.
In order to make the division, the home county treasurer may require the other county treasurers to certify the market value of the mortgaged property located in their counties.
If a county fails to submit the market value within a reasonable time, the county may be excluded from the determination of the ratio for the distribution.
In practice, this means that the county will not receive its share of the 3 percent of the total MRT.
Once the MRT is divided, the home county treasurer is to pay each county its share of the MRT on each multi-county mortgage on or before the 20th day of each month after the MRT is collected.
The home county treasurer is to send along with each county's payment a statement giving the legal description of the mortgaged real property and the market value of the real property
29
located in each county.
In order to identify the mortgage involved, the statement should also contain the names of the mortgagee and mortgagor, the amount of the principal debt, and the date on the mortgage document.
Example: multi-county mortgage with county disbursement Fritz Pirsch owns two video rental stores in western Minnesota.
One store is in St. Louis County and has a market value of $1,943,000.
The other store is in Wright County and is worth $1,957,000.
Business is good, and Mr. Pirsch wants to expand the stores.
Susan Dolan, an Applewood State Bank loan officer, approves Mr. Pirsch's application for a $1,000,000 business loan.
At the closing, Mr. Pirsch is required to sign a promissory note for $1,000,000 and a mortgage.
The mortgage creates a lien on each of the two video rental stores as security for the loan.
The mortgage contains a legal description of each of the video rental stores.
This makes the mortgage a multi-county mortgage.
At the closing, Susan Dolan also requires Mr. Pirsch to pay the $2,300 MRT as part of the closing costs.
The tax is based on the $1,000,000 principal debt secured by the mortgage.
Ms. Dolan gives Mr. Pirsch a bank cashier's check for $1,000,000 and the loan agreement is completed.
Ms. Dolan prepares a packet for the bank's messenger, containing Mr. Pirsch's mortgage, a check for the $2,300 MRT, and a letter certifying the market values of Mr. Pirsch's two stores.
She instructs the messenger to bring the packet to Bruce Hathaway, St. Louis County treasurer.
She also tells the messenger to get a copy of the mortgage after it is recorded so that it can be recorded in Wright County without paying any additional MRT.
The messenger completes everything as instructed.
After processing the mortgage, Mr. Hathaway works out the distribution of the total $2,300 MRT for Mr. Pirsch's multi-county mortgage.
The St. Louis County store is worth $1,943,000.
The Wright County store is worth $1,957,000.
The total market value of both stores is $3,900,000.
St. Louis County's ratio is 0.49 ($1,943,000/$3,900,000).
Wright County's ratio is 0.51 ($1,957,000/$3,900,000).
Therefore, St. Louis County's share of the total MRT is $1,127 ($2,300 X 0.49), and Wright County's share is $1,173 ($2,300 X 0.51).
Mr. Hathaway writes a St. Louis County warrant for $1,173 in the name of Janice Swanson, Wright County treasurer, and mails it along with a letter containing the legal descriptions and the market values of the two stores.
When Ms. Swanson receives the MRT warrant and records the copy of the mortgage received from the bank, the processing of Mr. Rossi's multi-county mortgage is complete.
30
Multi-State Mortgages A mortgage which creates a lien on real property in Minnesota and on real property in at least one other state is referred to as a multi-state mortgage.
The MRT law establishes two methods for determining the basis of the MRT on a multi-state mortgage.
FIRST OPTION: LIMITING CLAUSE Under the first method, the MRT basis for a multistate mortgage will be a portion of the debt.
This would be done according to M.S. Section 287.05, Subd. 1(a) by including the following statement, or its equivalent, on the first page: "Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, enforcement of this mortgage in Minnesota is limited to a debt amount of $__________under chapter 287 of Minnesota Statutes."
In such case, the tax shall be imposed based only on the amount of debt so stated to be secured by real property; and, the effect of the mortgage, or any amendment or extension, as evidence in any court in this state, or as notice for any purpose in this state, shall be limited to the amount contained in the statement and for which the tax has been paid and additional amounts for accrued interest and advances not subject to tax under subd 4 or section 287.035."
SECOND OPTION: RATIO METHOD The second method is the ratio method.
If a multistate mortgage does not contain the limiting statement described above, then the ratio method must be used to determine the MRT.
Here is the language of M.S. 287.05, Subd. 1 (b), that determines when and how the ratio method for taxing multi-state mortgages is used: "All multi-state mortgages not taxed under paragraph (a) shall be taxed under sections 287.01 to 287.13 as if the real property identified in the mortgage secures payment of that portion of the maximum debt amount referred to, or incorporated by reference, in the mortgage that is equal to a fraction the numerator of which is the value of the real property described in the mortgage that is
located in this state and the denominator of which is the value of all the real property described in the mortgage."
Both the limiting clause and the ratio method allow the tax to be paid on less than the total amount of principal debt secured by the mortgage when the mortgage debt is secured by real property located in Minnesota and in other states.
If a multi-state mortgage is secured by personal property in addition to real property located in Minnesota and in other states and the multi-state mortgage does not contain the limiting clause described in M.S. Section 287.05 Subd. 1 (a), the basis of the MRT is determined as if there were no personal property.
The value of the personal property is not a factor in the ratio method.
The ratio method uses only the values of the real property to determine the basis of the MRT on a multi-state mortgage.
MULTI-STATE MORTGAGE: RATIO METHOD REQUIREMENTS Mortgages using the ratio method must meet the requirements outlined below.
The county treasurer should not accept the MRT for any mortgage based on the ratio method unless the qualification requirements are met.
(M.S. 287.05, Subd. 1) 1.
The principal debt must be secured by at least one parcel of real property located in Minnesota and by at least one parcel of real property located in at least one state other than Minnesota.
2.
A legal description of each of the parcels of real property located in Minnesota and in the other state or states that are securing the principal debt (and that will be used in determining the basis for the MRT with the ratio method) must be listed in the mortgage document.
3.
If the mortgage document presented for recording does not contain a legal description of each of the parcels of real property as defined in clause #2, the county treasurer should grant the parties involved two options.
31
Option #1: The parties involved may pay the MRT on the principal debt secured by the mortgage.
The MRT is based on the principal debt instead of the portion of the debt determined by the ratio method.
In short, the mortgage is treated as a Minnesota mortgage.
Option #2: The parties involved may add to the mortgage document the legal description of each parcel of real property as defined in clause #2.
This may be done by either drafting a new mortgage document or by amending or supplementing the original mortgage document.
The mortgage document, including any amendments or supplements, must be recorded in the county recorder's office.
If this is done, the mortgage may be taxed as a multi-state mortgage, using the ratio method.
MULTI-STATE MORTGAGE: APPLICATION OF THE RATIO METHOD The four steps below have been historically used to implement the ratio method of determining the basis of the MRT on a multi-state mortgage.
Step #1: Determination of Fair Market Values The mortgagee, mortgagor or one of their official agents must certify to the county treasurer in writing the fair market values of the real property or properties located in Minnesota and in the other state or states.
The county treasurer may compare the fair market values of the Minnesota real property with the county assessor's taxable values.
If the fair market values supplied by the parties do not appear accurate, the county treasurer may use the assessor's estimated market values.
Step #2: Determination of the Multi-state Ratio When all the values have been obtained, the county treasurer must divide the total fair market value of all the Minnesota real property by the total fair market value of all the real property given as security for the principal debt.
This is the multistate ratio.
The multi-state ratio should be carried out to four decimal places.
For example, if the fair market value of the Minnesota real property were $65,450 and the fair market value of all the real properties were $145,375, the multi-state ratio would be 0.4502 ($65,450 / $145,375).
Step #3: Determination of the Basis of the MRT To obtain the basis of the MRT, the county treasurer must multiply the principal debt secured by the mortgage by the multi-state ratio.
The result is the portion of the principal debt subject to the MRT.
This is the basis of the MRT.
For example, if the principal debt secured by the mortgage were $200,000, the portion of the principal debt subject to the MRT would be $90,040, using the above 0.4502 multi-state ratio ($200,000 x 0.4502).
The $90,040 is the secured debt and the basis of the MRT for this example.
Step #4: Determination of the MRT The amount of the MRT due on a multi-state mortgage is determined by the same formula used for all mortgages.
Here is the formula: multiply the principal debt amount subject to MRT by .0023 and round the result to the nearest penny.
In the above example, the $90,040 principal debt subject to the MRT would be multiplied by .0023 and would equal a MRT of $207.09.
32
Agricultural Conservation Fee All seven metropolitan counties and three nonmetro counties have chosen to become agricultural land preservation pilot counties under M.S. 40A.
Each county must collect a $5 agricultural conservation fee on each recording of a mortgage subject to the MRT and deed subject to Deed Tax.
(M.S. 40A.152, Subd. 1) As of July 2003, the following 10 counties are part of the program: Anoka Dakota Ramsey Waseca Wright Carver Hennepin Scott Washington Winona
the $5 ag fee in both counties or just in the home county? Answer: The law sets up two rules for charging the $5 ag fee: (a) the fee is to be charged on each deed that is subject to the deed tax, and (b) the fee is to be charged each time a deed is recorded.
When Greenway brings the deed to the home county treasurer's office, the official collects the $297 deed tax and stamps the deed as paid.
The official also collects the $5 ag fee.
The home county recorder's office records the deed and makes a duplicate copy of the deed for Greenway.
When Greenway takes the duplicate deed to the other county, the treasurer's office does require Greenway to pay another $5 ag fee but does not charge an additional deed tax.
The duplicate deed can then be filed with the county recorder's office.
M.S. 40A.152, Subd. 1.
Note: The Minnesota Agricultural Land Preservation Program is administered by the Minnesota Department of Agriculture.
Please contact Bob Patton at (651) 296-5226 with questions regarding the program.
The $5 agricultural conservation fee is usually referred to as the $5 ag fee.
The $5 ag fee should be collected by the county treasurer at the same time that the MRT and/or Deed Tax is collected.
The $5 ag fee is in addition to the MRT and DT.
If a mortgage is subject to MRT, the $5 ag fee is to be collected.
If a deed is subject to DT, the $5 ag fee is to be collected.
The $5 ag fee must be charged on each recording of a mortgage that is subject to the MRT.
For example, any duplicate copy of a taxable mortgage presented for recording in another county other than the home county where the master copy of the mortgage is recorded is subject to the $5 ag fee.
Example Greenway Foods Corporation buys 20 acres of land in the metropolitan suburbs from Ridgewood Realty for $90,000.
The land is located in two counties.
Greenway plans to build regional offices and several large warehouses on the new site.
At the closing, Ridgewood executes a warranty deed conveying legal ownership of the 20 acres to Greenway.
Greenway gives Ridgewood a certified check for $90,000.
Ridgewood gives Greenway a check for $297.00 to cover the deed tax on the total consideration of $90,000.
Question: Greenway wants to record the deed in both counties.
Both counties are required to collect the agricultural conservation fee.
Will they have to pay
33
Administrative Procedures MRT MUST BE PAID BEFORE RECORDING The mortgage registration tax (MRT) laws specifically state that the mortgagor (borrower) is legally responsible for paying the MRT. (M.S. 287.035) Also, the laws are clear that a mortgage cannot be recorded until the MRT is paid.(M.S. 287.08 and M.S. 287.10) In the words of M.S. 287.08(a): "The tax imposed by sections 287.01 to 287.12 must be paid to the treasurer of any county in this state in which the real property or some part is located at or before the time of filing the mortgage for record."
M.S. 287.10 reads: "A mortgage, or documents relating to its foreclosure, assignment, or satisfaction, must not be recorded or registered unless the tax has been paid."
DISPUTE OVER CORRECT AMOUNT OF MRT Whenever there is a dispute over the correct amount of MRT due on a mortgage, the county treasurer should require the higher amount
determined by the county treasurer to be paid before the mortgage may be recorded.
Along with requiring the higher MRT to be paid, the county treasurer should give the taxpayer the option of submitting a written request to the county treasurer for a refund.
The written request should present an argument with evidence for why the lower MRT should have been accepted.
The request for a refund must be submitted within three and one-half years from the date of the payment of the tax.
(M.S. 287.08(b)) If the argument and the evidence are accepted and within the time limit, the county treasurer may grant the refund.
If not, the MRT stands as paid.
DUE DATE The state's share (97 percent) of the MRT receipts are due by the 20th of the month following collection.
The payment is submitted by electronic funds transfer (EFT).
A report form is faxed to the Special Taxes Division at (651) 297-1939.
34
Appendix Minnesota Statute Chapter 287 ................................................................................
35 Revenue Notice 01-05: Affordable Housing Programs ...........................................
47 Revenue Notice 01-06: Agricultural Loans .............................................................
50
35
Minnesota Statutes 2001, Chapter 287.
Copyright 2001 by the Office of Revisor of Statutes, State of Minnesota.
287.01 Definitions; mortgage registry tax.
Subd 1.
Words, terms, and phrases.
Unless the language or context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended, the following words, terms, and phrases, for the purposes of sections 287.01 to 287.13, have the meanings given them in this section.
Subd. 2.
Amendment.
"Amendment" means generally a document that alters an existing mortgage without securing a new debt, or increasing the amount of an existing debt; and, that does not, in the case of a multistate mortgage described in section 287.05, subd 1, paragraph (b), result in an increased percentage of the real property encumbered by the mortgage being located in this state.
A document is an amendment if it meets the definition in this subd, including documents that do any one or more of the following: (i) extends the time for payment of the unpaid portion of the original debt; (ii) changes the rate of interest applicable to the unpaid portion of the original debt; (iii) adds additional real property as security for the unpaid portion of the original debt; (iv) releases some but not all of the real property serving as security for the unpaid portion of the debt; (v) replaces all the real property serving as security for the unpaid portion of the debt with other real property regardless of value; (vi) replaces a party previously bound by the mortgage with a new party who becomes bound by the same amended mortgage; or (vii) reduces the amount of the debt secured by real property located in this state, or in the case of a multistate mortgage described in section 287.05, subd 1, paragraph (b), reduces the percentage of real property encumbered by the mortgage that is located in this State.
Subd. 3.
Debt.
"Debt" means the principal amount of an obligation to pay money that is secured in whole or in part by a mortgage of an interest in real property.
Subd. 4.
Decree of marriage dissolution.
"Decree of marriage dissolution" includes a summary real estate disposition judgment or an instrument made under it.
Subd. 5.
Extension.
"Extension" means any document that alters an existing mortgage by extending the time for repayment without increasing the amount of debt secured by real property that is located in this state.
Subd. 6.
Mortgage.
"Mortgage" means any instrument, including a decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made under it, creating or evidencing a lien of any kind on real property, given by an owner of real property as security for a debt, notwithstanding that the debt may also be secured in part by a lien upon personalty.
Subd. 7.
Multistate mortgage.
"Multistate mortgage" means a mortgage that encumbers real property located both in and outside of this state.
Subd. 8.
Person.
"Person" includes any individual, partner, officer, director, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, cooperative, social club, fraternal organization, municipal or private corporation, whether organized for profit or not, estate, trusts, business trusts, receiver, trustee, syndicate, the United States, a state, any political subd of a state, or any group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular.
The term includes any agent of any individual or organization enumerated in this subdivision.
Subd. 9.
Real property, real estate, and land.
"Real property," "real estate," and "land" have the meanings contained in chapter 500, and include all interests in real property that can be conveyed by a document which may be recorded.
Subd. 10. Record, recorded, and recording.
"Record," "recorded," and "recording" each mean that a document has been delivered to and filed in the office of the county recorder or registrar of titles, whichever office maintains the records for the real property described in the document.
HIST: (2322) 1907 c 328 s 1; 1965 c 51 s 51; 1976 c 181 s 2; 1983 c 233 s 1; 1990 c 575 s 1; 1999 c 31 s 1; 1999 c 243 art 16 s 11; 2000 c 490 art 10 s 2
36
287.02 287.02 Repealed, 1987 c 268 art 14 s 25 287.03 Instruments valid security for debt.
No instrument, other than a decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made pursuant to it, relating to real estate shall be valid as security for any debt, unless the fact that it is intended and the initial known amount of the debt are expressed in it.
HIST: (2322) 1907 c 328 s 1; 1983 c 233 s 2; 1999 c 31 s 2 287.035 Imposition of tax.
A tax is imposed on the privilege of recording a mortgage.
The tax rate is .0023 of the debt or portion of a debt that is secured by any recorded mortgage of real property located in this state.
The person liable for the tax is the mortgagor.
The tax is not imposed on the lawful interest amounts that may accrue with respect to a debt.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 3; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 s 24 287.04 Exemptions.
The tax imposed by section 287.035 does not apply to: (a) A decree of marriage dissolution or an instrument made pursuant to it.
(b) A mortgage given to correct a misdescription of the mortgaged property.
(c) A mortgage or other instrument that adds additional security for the same debt for which mortgage registry tax has been paid.
(d) A contract for the conveyance of any interest in real property, including a contract for deed. (e) A mortgage secured by real property subject to the minerals production tax of sections 298.24 to 298.28.
(f) The principal amount of a mortgage loan made under a low and moderate income or other affordable housing program, if the mortgagee is a federal, state, or local government agency.
(g) Mortgages granted by fraternal benefit societies subject to section 64B.24.
(h) A mortgage amendment or extension, as defined in section 287.01.
(i) An agricultural mortgage if the proceeds of the loan secured by the mortgage are used to acquire or improve real property classified
under section 273.13, subd 23, paragraph (a), or (b), clause (1), (2), or (3).
HIST: (2322) 1907 c 328 s 1; 1965 c 51 s 53; 1967 c 340 s 1; 1983 c 233 s 3; 1993 c 271 s 4; 1999 c 31 s 4; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 287.05 Determination of tax in special situations.
Subd 1.
Real property outside Minnesota.
(a) When a multistate mortgage is intended to secure only a portion of a debt amount recited or referred to in the mortgage, the mortgage may contain the following statement, or its equivalent, on the first page: "Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, enforcement of this mortgage in Minnesota is limited to a debt amount of $.......under chapter 287 of Minnesota Statutes."
In such case, the tax shall be imposed based only on the amount of debt so stated to be secured by real property located in this state; and, the effect of the mortgage, or any amendment or extension, as evidence in any court in this state, or as notice for any purpose in this state, shall be limited to the amount contained in the statement and for which the tax has been paid and additional amounts for accrued interest and advances not subject to tax under subd 4 or section 287.035.
(b) All multistate mortgages not taxed under paragraph (a) shall be taxed under sections 287.01 to 287.13 as if the real property identified in the mortgage secures payment of that portion of the maximum debt amount referred to, or incorporated by reference, in the mortgage that is equal to a fraction the numerator of which is the value of the real property described in the mortgage that is located in this state and the denominator of which is the value of all the real property described in the mortgage.
Subd. 1a.
Real property in this state secures portion of debt.
(a) When the real property identified in a mortgage is located entirely in this state and is intended to secure only a portion of a debt amount recited or referred to in the mortgage, the mortgage may contain the following statement, or its equivalent, on the first page: "Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, enforcement of this mortgage is limited to a debt amount of $.......
under chapter 287 of Minnesota Statutes."
In such case, the tax shall be imposed based only on the amount of debt so stated to be secured by real property; and, the effect of the
37
mortgage, or any amendment or extension, as evidence in any court in this state, or as notice for any purpose in this state, shall be limited to the amount contained in the statement and for which the tax has been paid and additional amounts for accrued interest and advances not subject to tax under subd 4 or section 287.035.
(b) All mortgages that are not multistate mortgages and that are not taxed under paragraph (a) shall be taxed under sections 287.01 to 287.13 as if the real property identified in the mortgage secures payment of the maximum debt amount referred to, or incorporated by reference, in the mortgage.
Subd. 2.
Supplemental mortgages.
Except for an amendment or a revision to a reverse mortgage as described under subd 6, any document that alters an existing mortgage by providing for an increase in the amount of debt secured by real property located in this state, or, in the case of a multistate mortgage described in subd 1, paragraph (b), an increase in the percentage of Minnesota real estate as compared to the total real estate that is encumbered by the mortgage, shall be taxed based upon the increase in the amount of the debt determined to be secured by real property located in this state under either subd 1 or 1a.
Subd. 3.
Revolving lines of credit.
When a mortgage, including a reverse mortgage, secures a revolving line of credit under which advances, payments, and readvances may be made from time to time, the tax imposed under section 287.035 must be paid on the maximum amount of the line of credit that may be secured at any one time, as expressed in the mortgage, regardless of the time or amount of advances, payments, or readvances.
Subd. 4.
Advances by mortgagee.
No tax under section 287.035 shall be paid on the indeterminate amount that may be advanced by the mortgagee in protection of the mortgaged premises or the mortgage, including taxes, assessments, charges, claims, fines, impositions, and insurance premiums; the amounts due upon prior or superior mortgages and other prior or superior liens, encumbrances, and interests; and legal expenses and attorneys' fees.
Subd. 5.
Indeterminate amounts.
When a mortgage secures an indeterminate amount other than those described in subd 3, 4, or 6, no tax shall be paid at the time the mortgage is recorded, but the tax must be paid at the time of recording an affidavit or other
document stating the amount and time of the actual advance.
Subd. 6.
Reverse mortgages.
If real property secures a reverse mortgage, the principal debt or obligation to which mortgage registry tax applies is the expected total disbursements or cash equivalent to be made under the terms of the loan.
Interest accruing on the disbursements made is not subject to mortgage registry tax.
In the case of periodic payments made for an indefinite length of time, the expected total disbursements must equal the product of the periodic payment amounts and the number of payments and, if applicable, the amount of cash distribution or its equivalent.
The number of payments must be based upon the life expectancy assumption used in determining the payment amount.
In the case of reverse mortgages made as part of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987, section 255 of the National Housing Act, and administered by the Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), mortgage registry tax must not be assessed on Federal Housing Administration mortgage insurance premiums, monthly lender service fees, or payments to be distributed to the borrower by HUD.
Subd. 7.
Mortgages to secure obligations to be issued.
If a mortgage is made to a mortgagee in trust to secure the payment of bonds or other obligations yet to be issued, a statement may be incorporated in the mortgage stating the amount of the obligations already issued or yet to be issued, and the tax to be paid on filing the mortgage for recording must be computed upon the amount so stated.
The statement must be binding and conclusive upon all persons claiming through or under the mortgage, and no such obligation issued in excess of the aggregate so fixed is valid for any purpose unless the additional tax is paid and receipted by the proper county treasurer.
Subd. 8.
Amendments.
An amendment may contain the following statement, or its equivalent, on its first page: "This is a mortgage amendment, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 287.01, subd 2, and as such it does not secure a new or an increased amount of debt."
In such cases, the document will be treated as a mortgage amendment, as defined in section 287.01, subd 2, and does not serve to secure a new or an increased amount of debt.
38
HIST: (2323) 1907 c 328 s 2; 1913 c 163 s 1; 1917 c 73 s 1; 1921 c 445 s 1; 1945 c 288 s 1; 1951 c 591 s 1; 1957 c 167 s 1; 1961 c 499 s 1; 1967 c 340 s 2; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1983 c 342 art 2 s 24; 1984 c 502 art 14 s 7-9; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 1; 1987 c 268 art 14 s 13; 1987 c 403 art 2 s 147; 1991 c 291 art 20 s 2; 1999 c 31 s 5; 1999 c 243 art 16 s 12,13 ==287.06 287.06 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 ==287.07 287.07 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26==287.08 287.08 Tax, how payable; receipts.
(a) The tax imposed by sections 287.01 to 287.12 must be paid to the treasurer of any county in this state in which the real property or some part is located at or before the time of filing the mortgage for record.
The treasurer shall endorse receipt on the mortgage and the receipt is conclusive proof that the tax has been paid in the amount stated and authorizes any county recorder or registrar of titles to record the mortgage.
Its form, in substance, shall be "registration tax hereon of ..................... dollars paid."
If the mortgage is exempt from taxation the endorsement shall, in substance, be "exempt from registration tax."
In either case the receipt must be signed by the treasurer.
In case the treasurer is unable to determine whether a claim of exemption should be allowed, the tax must be paid as in the case of a taxable mortgage.
(b) The county treasurer may refund in whole or in part any mortgage registry tax overpayment if a written application by the taxpayer is submitted to the county treasurer within 3-1/2 years from the date of the overpayment.
If the county has not issued a denial of the application, the taxpayer may bring an action in tax court in the county in which the tax was paid at any time after the expiration of six months from the time that the application was submitted.
A denial of refund may be appealed within 60 days from the date of the denial by bringing an action in tax court in the county in which the tax was paid.
The action is commenced by the serving of a petition for relief on the county treasurer, and by filing a copy with the court.
The county attorney shall defend the action.
The county treasurer shall notify the treasurer of each county that has or would receive a portion of the tax as paid.
(c) If the county treasurer determines a refund should be paid, or if a refund is ordered by the court, the county treasurer of each county that actually
received a portion of the tax shall immediately pay a proportionate share of three percent of the refund using any available county funds.
The county treasurer of each county that received, or would have received, a portion of the tax shall also pay their county's proportionate share of the remaining 97 percent of the court-ordered refund on or before the 20th day of the following month using solely the mortgage registry tax funds that would be paid to the commissioner of revenue on that date under section 287.12.
If the funds on hand under this procedure are insufficient to fully fund 97 percent of the court-ordered refund, the county treasurer of the county in which the action was brought shall file a claim with the comissioner of revenue under section 16A.48 for the remaining portion of 97 percent of the refund, and shall pay over the remaining portion upon receipt of a warrant from the state issued pursuant to the claim.
(d) When any mortgage covers real property located in more than one county in this state the total tax must be paid to the treasurer of the county where the mortgage is first presented for recording, and the payment must be receipted as provided in paragraph (a).
If the principal debt or obligation secured by such a multiple county mortgage exceeds $1,000,000, the nonstate portion of the tax must be divided and paid over by the county treasurer receiving it, on or before the 20th day of each month after receipt, to the county or counties entitled in the ratio that the market value of the real property covered by the mortgage in each county bears to the market value of all the real property in this state described in the mortgage.
In making the division and payment the county treasurer shall send a statement giving the description of the real property described in the mortgage and the market value of the part located in each county.
For this purpose, the treasurer of any county may require the treasurer of any other county to certify to the former the market valuation of any tract of real property in any mortgage.
(e) The mortgagor must pay the tax imposed by sections 287.01 to 287.12.
The mortgagee may undertake to collect and remit the tax on behalf of the mortgagor.
If the mortgagee collects money from the mortgagor to remit the tax on behalf of the mortgagor, the mortgagee has a fiduciary duty to remit the tax on behalf of the mortgagor as to the amount of the tax collected for that purpose and the mortgagor is relieved of any further obligation to
39
pay the tax as to the amount collected by the mortgagee for this purpose.
HIST: (2326) 1907 c 328 s 5; 1965 c 51 s 55; 1976 c 181 s 2; 1983 c 222 s 21; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 2; 1986 c 444; 1Sp1986 c 3 art 1 s 82; 1997 c 84 art 1 s 2; 1998 c 389 art 3 s 15; 1999 c 31 s 6; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 s 26 287.09 287.09 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.10 287.10 Prepayment of tax; evidence; notice.
A mortgage, or documents relating to its foreclosure, assignment, or satisfaction, must not be recorded unless the tax has been paid.
Except as provided in section 582.25, a document or any record of the mortgage may not be received in evidence in any court, and is not valid notice, unless the tax has been paid.
If the tax is paid, an error in computation or ascertainment of the amount does not affect the validity of the mortgage or the record or foreclosure.
This section does not apply to a mortgage that is exempt from the tax imposed under section 287.035.
HIST: (2328) 1907 c 328 s 7; 1913 c 163 s 2; 1929 c 222 s 1; 1Sp1985 c 18 s 3; 1987 c 268 art 14 s 14; 1999 c 31 s 7 287.11 Mortgages recorded or registered prior to passage of sections 287.01 to 287.12.
All mortgages of real property recorded prior to the passage of sections 287.01 to 287.12 are taxable under the provisions of law existing prior to the enactment of sections 287.01 to 287.12; provided, that the holder of any such mortgage may pay to the treasurer of the proper county the tax based upon the amount of the debt secured by the mortgage at the time of the payment as stated by the affidavit of the owner of the mortgage.
The affidavit may be filed with the county treasurer, in which case the treasurer's receipt must be endorsed on it.
The county recorder or registrar of titles, on presentation of the receipt, shall make a record of the date and amount of the payment.
Thereafter the mortgage lien shall not be otherwise taxable.
HIST: (2329) 1907 c 328 s 8; 1913 c 163 s 3; 1965 c 51 s 56; 1976 c 181 s 2; 1999 c 31 s 8
287.12 287.12 Taxes, how apportioned.
(a) All taxes paid to the county treasurer under the provisions of sections 287.01 to 287.12 must be apportioned, 97 percent to the general fund of the state, and three percent to the county revenue fund.
(b) On or before the 20th day of each month the county treasurer shall determine and pay to the commissioner of revenue for deposit in the state treasury and credit to the general fund the state's portion of the receipts from the mortgage registry tax during the preceding month subject to the electronic payment requirements of section 270.771.
The county treasurer shall provide any related reports requested by the commissioner of revenue.
HIST: (2330) 1907 c 328 s 9; 1913 c 352 s 1; 1963 c 713 s 1; 1965 c 51 s 57; 1969 c 399 s 49; 1973 c 650 art 5 s 1; 1981 c 164 s 1; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 4; 1Sp1986 c 1 art 4 s 36; 1987 c 403 art 2 s 148; 1989 c 282 art 1 s 19; 1Sp1989 c 1 art 3 s 24; 1999 c 31 s 9; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 17 s 6 287.13 Violations; civil penalties.
Subd 1.
Failure to pay full amount.
Any person liable for the tax imposed by section 287.035 who fails to pay the full amount of mortgage registry tax imposed under this chapter, unless the failure is shown to be due to reasonable cause, is liable for a civil penalty of $250 or 100 percent of the tax for each such failure, whichever is less.
Subd. 2.
Additional penalty.
Any person who willfully attempts to evade or defeat the tax imposed under sections 287.01 to 287.12, or the payment thereof, shall, in addition to the penalty provided in subd 1, be liable for a penalty of 50 percent of the total amount of the underpayment of the tax.
Subd. 3.
Payment to mortgagee.
If a mortgagee undertakes to collect from the mortgagor the amount of the tax due under sections 287.01 to 287.12 as provided in section 287.08, paragraph (e), the mortgagor is not subject to the penalties under this section and the mortgagee is subject to the provisions of this section.
HIST: 1997 c 84 art 6 s 17; 1999 c 31 s 10; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 s 27 287.20 Definitions; deed tax.
40
Subd 1.
Words, terms, and phrases.
Unless the language or context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended, the following words, terms, and phrases, for the purposes of sections 287.21 to 287.31, have the meanings given to them in this section.
Subd. 2.
Consideration.
(a) "Consideration" means generally the total monetary value that is given in return for a conveyance of real property in this state and includes all lump-sum payments, all prior or future installment payments that are required under the agreement between the parties, and the fair market value of any property taken, or to be taken, in exchange.
(b) Consideration does not include the reasonable and lawful amounts of interest paid for the privilege of paying the purchase price in installments and the fair market value of any items of intangible personal property that are conveyed by the taxable instrument.
(c) Consideration does not include the amount paid for the personal property located on the real property being conveyed and transferred as a part of the total consideration, except that the amount paid for the personal property located on the real property being conveyed must be included if the real property being conveyed is a one-, two-, or three-unit residential structure.
(d) When a conveyance of real property is made pursuant to a contract for deed, the consideration is the price for the real property reflected in the contract; except that, subject to the limitations under section 287.221, if the contract for deed, or other agreement entered into as a condition to the seller executing the contract, requires the property to be improved during the term of the contract and the price of the real property as reflected in the contract does not include the consideration for the required improvements, then the consideration is the price for the real property as reflected in the contract and the consideration for the required improvements added during the term of the contract.
(e) "Total consideration" has the same meaning as consideration.
(f) "Consideration, exclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining at the time of sale"
or "net consideration" means the amount of consideration as reduced by the amount outstanding under any lien that attached to the real property prior to the time of sale and that is not released or satisfied as a result of the sale.
Subd. 3.
Consolidation or merger.
"Consolidation" or "merger" means the combination of all of the assets of two or more corporations, limited liability companies, or partnerships, or any combination of these entities, whether or not title the the assets is taken by a newly created entity or by a preexisting entity that survives the consolidation or merger in an altered form.
Subd. 4.
Documentary stamps.
"Documentary stamps" means all stamps issued by the county for use in payment of the taxes imposed by sections 287.21 to 287.37.
Subd. 5.
Lien.
"Lien" means any legal claim, other than an easement, created by contract, statute, or law on the real property of another as security for a debt or obligation.
For purposes of the deed tax, the term "encumbrance" is synonymous with the term "lien" and an easement is not a lien.
Subd. 6.
Person.
"Person" includes any individual, partner, officer, director, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, cooperative, social club, fraternal organization, municipal or private corporation, whether organized for profit or not, estate, trusts, business trusts, receiver, trustee, syndicate, the United States, a state, any political subdivision of a state, or any group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular.
The term includes directors and officers of corporations, governors and managers of a limited liability company, or members of partnerships who, either individually or jointly with others, have control, supervision, or responsibility of making or authorizing payment of the tax imposed by section 287.21.
The term includes any agent of any individual or organization enumerated in this subd.
Subd. 7.
Real property, real estate, and land.
"Real property," "real estate," and "land" mean any fee simple estate, and any estate for life, as defined in chapter 500, and the purchaser's interest under a contract for the conveyance of such an estate.
Subd. 8. Record, recorded, and recording.
"Record," "recorded," and "recording" each mean
41
that a document has been delivered to and filed in the office of the county recorder or registrar of titles, whichever office maintains the records for the real property described in the document.
Subd. 9.
Reorganization.
"Reorganization" means the transfer of substantially all of the assets of a corporation, a limited liability company, or a partnership not in the usual or regular course of business if at the time of the transfer the transfer qualifies as: (i) a corporate reorganization under section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended through December 31, 2000; or (ii) a transfer pursuant to the continuation of an existing partnership under section 708 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended through December 31, 2000.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 11; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 s 28,29 287.21 Imposition of tax; determination of tax.
Subd 1.
Determination of tax.
(a) A tax is imposed on each deed or instrument by which any real property in this state is granted, assigned, transferred, or otherwise conveyed.
The tax applies against the net consideration.
(b) The tax is determined in the following manner: (1) when transfers are made by instruments pursuant to mergers, consolidations, sales, or transfers of substantially all of the assets of the entities as defined in section 287.20, subd 9, pursuant to plans of reorganization, the tax is $1.65; (2) when there is no consideration or when the consideration, exclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining thereon at the time of sale, is $500 or less, the tax is $1.65; or (3) when the consideration, exclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining at the time of sale, exceeds $500, the tax is .0033 of the net consideration.
(c) The tax is due at the time a taxable deed or instrument is presented for recording.
Subd. 2.
Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 Subd. 3.
Expired Subd. 4.
Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 HIST: 1961 c 647 s 1; Ex1967 c 32 art 11 s 1; 1969 c 399 s 24; 1973 c 118 s 1; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 5; 1987 c 268 art 14 s 15; 1987 c 403 art 2 s 149; 1988 c 719 art 19 s 13; 1990 c 480 art 7 s 23; 1993 c 375 art 3 s 39; 1999 c 31 s 12; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 s 30
287.22 Exemptions.
The tax imposed by section 287.21 does not apply to: (1) An executory contract for the sale of real property under which the purchaser is entitled to or does take possession of the real property, or any assignment or cancellation of the contract; (2) A mortgage or an amendment, assignment, extension, partial release, or satisfaction of a mortgage; (3) A will; (4) A plat; (5) A lease, amendment of lease, assignment of lease, or memorandum of lease; (6) A deed, instrument, or writing in which the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof is the grantor, assignor, transferor, conveyor, grantee, or assignee; (7) A deed for a cemetery lot or lots; (8) A deed of distribution by a personal representative; (9) A deed to or from a co-owner partitioning their undivided interest in the same piece of real property; (10) A deed or other instrument of conveyance issued pursuant to a permanent school fund land exchange under section 92.121 and related laws; (11) A referee's or sheriff's certificate of sale in a mortgage or lien foreclosure sale; (12) A referee's, sheriff's, or certificate holder's certificate of redemption from a mortgage or lien foreclosure sale issued to the redeeming mortgagor or lienee; (13) A deed, instrument, or writing which grants, creates, modifies, or terminates an easement; and (14) A decree of marriage dissolution, as defined in section 287.01, subd 4, or a deed or other instrument between the parties to the dissolution made pursuant to the terms of the decree.
42
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 2; 1963 c 249 s 1; 1971 c 835 s 1; 1975 c 347 s 1; 1984 c 590 s 1; 1987 c 268 art 14 s 16; 1991 c 291 art 21 s 11; 1993 c 375 art 3 s 40; 1997 c 31 art 3 s 13; 1997 c 231 art 16 s 9; 1999 c 31 s 13 287.2205 287.2205 Tax-forfeited land.
Before a state deed for tax-forfeited land may be issued, the deed tax must be paid by the purchaser of tax-forfeited land whether the purchase is the result of a public auction or private sale or a repurchase of tax-forfeited land.
State agencies and local units of government that acquire tax-forfeited land by purchase or any other means are subject to this section.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 14 287.221 287.221 New residential construction.
The commissioner of revenue may not enforce a deed tax assessment on the consideration paid for an improvement in the case of new residential construction if, at or before the time the first residential owners of the improvement take possession, the deed tax has been paid on the consideration paid for the improvement.
HIST: 1997 c 231 art 16 s 10 287.23 Real property outside county or state.
Subd 1.
Real property outside county.
If any taxable deed or instrument describes any real property located in more than one county in this state, the total tax must be paid to the treasurer of the county where the document is first presented for recording, and the payment must be receipted as provided in section 287.08.
If the net consideration exceeds $700,000, the nonstate portion of the tax must be divided and paid over by the county treasurer receiving it, on or before the 20th day of each month after receipt, to the county or counties entitled in the ratio which the market value of the real property covered by the document in each county bears to the market value of all the real property in this state described in the document.
In making the division and payment the county treasurer shall send a statement to the other involved counties giving the description of the real property described in the document and the market value of the part located in
each county.
The treasurer of any county may require the treasurer of any other county to certify to the former the market valuation of any parcel of real property for this purpose.
Subd. 2.
Real property outside state.
If any deed or instrument describes any real property located outside of this state, the tax imposed by section 287.21 must be measured upon such proportion of the consideration, exclusive of the value of any lien or encumbrance remaining at the time of sale, as the value of the real property described in this state bears to the value of the whole of the real property described in the deed or instrument.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 3; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 6; 1999 c 31 s 15 287.24 Persons liable.
Subd 1.
General rule.
Any person who grants, assigns, transfers, or conveys any real property by a deed or instrument subject to the tax imposed by section 287.21 shall be liable for such tax but no public official shall be liable for a tax with respect to any instrument executed by the official in connection with official duties.
Subd. 2.
Other responsible persons.
If an underpayment is assessable by the commissioner of revenue against a grantor pursuant to section 287.37, and the grantor is a business entity no longer in existence, any person who, either individually or jointly with others, had control over, supervision of, or responsibility for making the statement of tax due or exemption from tax that was submitted to the county treasurer under section 287.241, subd 1, can be assessed and held liable by the commissioner for the underpayment.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 4; 1986 c 444; 1999 c 31 s 16 287.241 Statement of tax due or exemption; recording or registering of documents.
Subd 1.
Statement of tax due or exemption.
No deed or instrument, taxable under the provisions of section 287.21, shall be recorded unless it contains the statement of the grantor or grantee, or any successor in interest, setting forth the amount of tax due under this chapter or that it is exempt from tax.
The county recorder or registrar of titles shall record any deed or instrument when the statement sets
43
forth that the transfer is tax exempt, or when documentary stamps or the treasurer's receipt appear for the amount of deed tax recited in the statement.
The validity or effectiveness of a deed or instrument as between the parties, and as to any person who would otherwise be bound, is not affected by the failure to comply with this section.
If a deed or instrument is accepted for recording contrary to this section, the failure to comply does not destroy or impair the record of the deed or instrument as notice.
Subd. 2.
Notice of certificate of value.
No deed or instrument providing for the transfer of title to real property that is subject to the tax as provided in section 287.21, and no executory contract for the sale of land, shall be recorded unless such deed or instrument is accompanied by a notice from the county auditor that a certificate of value was filed in the auditor's office as provided in section 272.115.
Subd. 3.
Repealed, 1977 c 423 art 4 s 11 Subd. 4.
Repealed, 1977 c 423 art 4 s 11 HIST: 1963 c 831 s 1; 1971 c 838 s 1; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1974 c 253 s 1,2; 1976 c 181 s 2; 1977 c 423 art 4 s 10; 1986 c 444; 1999 c 31 s 17 287.25 Payment of tax; stamps.
The county board shall determine the method for collection of the tax imposed by section 287.21: (1) The tax imposed by section 287.21 may be paid by the affixing of a documentary stamp or stamps in the amount of the tax to the document or instrument with respect to which the tax is paid, provided that the county board may permit the payment of the tax without the affixing of the documentary stamps and in such cases shall direct the treasurer to endorse a receipt for such tax upon the face of the document or instrument.
(2) The tax imposed by section 287.21 may be paid in the manner prescribed by section 287.08 relating to payment of mortgage registration tax.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 5; 1969 c 399 s 1; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1985 c 300 s 18; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 7 287.26 Cancellation of stamps.
A person using or affixing a stamp shall cancel it and so deface it as to render it unfit for reuse by marking it in ink with the person's initials and the date on which such affixing occurs.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 6; 1986 c 444 287.27 Stamps; printing and sale-meters.
Subd 1.
The county board may have documentary stamps printed and furnish them to the county treasurer.
Documentary stamps may be purchased only from the county treasurer and may not be sold for use in any county other than the county in which the property is located.
Subd. 2.
The county board may authorize any person to utilize a tax meter machine upon the filing of a corporate surety bond, in a suitable amount to guarantee the payment of the tax, such amount to be determined by the county board.
The county board may provide rules for the use of such a machine, supervise its operation and provide for the payment of the tax on any deed or document so stamped.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 7; 1965 c 454 s 1; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 13; 1Sp1986 c 1 art 4 s 49,50 287.28 Refunds or redemption.
(a) The county treasurer may redeem stamps issued under the authority of sections 287.20 to 287.31 that have been spoiled, destroyed, or rendered useless or unfit for the purpose intended or for which the owner may have no use or which through mistake may have been improperly or unnecessarily used.
Redemption shall be made only upon written application of the taxpayer.
(b) The county treasurer may refund any deed tax overpayment if a written application by the taxpayer is submitted to the county treasurer within 3-1/2 years from the date of the overpayment.
If the county has not issued a denial of the application, the taxpayer may bring an action in tax court in the county in which the tax was paid at any time after the expiration of six months from the time that the application was submitted.
A denial of refund may be appealed within 60 days from the date of the denial by commencing an action in tax court in the
44
county where the tax was paid.
The action is commenced by serving a petition for relief on the county treasurer, and filing a copy with the court.
The county attorney shall defend the action.
The county treasurer shall notify the treasurer of each county that has, or would receive a portion of the tax as paid.
Any refund of deed tax which the county treasurer determines should be made, and any court ordered refund of deed tax, shall be accomplished using the refund procedures in section 287.08.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 8; 1969 c 97 s 3; 1969 c 399 s 1; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 9; 1997 c 84 art 1 s 3; 2000 c 260 s 48; 1Sp2001 c 5 art 7 s 31 287.29 Payment of receipts to state general fund; reports.
Subd 1.
Appointment and payment of tax proceeds.
(a) The proceeds of the taxes levied and collected under sections 287.21 to 287.39 must be apportioned, 97 percent to the general fund of the state, and three percent to the county revenue fund.
(b) On or before the 20th day of each month, the county treasurer shall determine and pay to the commissioner of revenue for deposit in the state treasury and credit to the general fund the state's portion of the receipts for deed tax from the preceding month subject to the electronic transfer requirements of section 270.771.
The county treasurer shall provide any related reports requested by the commissioner of revenue.
Subd. 2.
Repealed, 1981 c 164 s 12 Subd. 3.
Repealed, 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 13 HIST: 1961 c 647 s 9; 1969 c 399 s 1; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1981 c 164 s 2; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 10; 1Sp1986 c 1 art 4 s 37; 1Sp1989 c 1 art 3 s 25; 1990 c 480 art 7 s 24; 1999 c 31 s 18; 2000 c 260 s 49 287.30 County treasurer; duties.
The care of documentary stamps entrusted to county treasurers and the duties imposed upon county treasurers by this chapter are within the duties of such office and are within the coverage of any official bond delivered to the state, conditioned that any such officer shall faithfully execute the duties of office.
The county board may by resolution require the county auditor to perform any duty imposed on the county treasurer under this chapter.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 10; 1986 c 444; 1999 c 31 s 19 287.31 Violations; civil penalties.
Subd 1.
Failure to pay full amount.
Any person liable for the tax imposed by section 287.21 who fails to pay the full amount of deed tax imposed under this chapter, unless the failure is shown to be due to reasonable cause, is liable to a civil penalty of $250, or 100 percent of the tax, for each such failure, whichever is less.
Subd. 2.
Willful evasion.
Any person who willfully attempts in any manner to evade or defeat any such tax or the payment thereof, is, in addition to other penalties provided by law, liable to a penalty of 50 percent of the total amount of the underpayment of the tax.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 11; 1997 c 84 art 6 s 18; 1999 c 31 s 20 287.32 Repealed, 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 13 287.325 Violations; criminal penalties.
Any person who in any manner intentionally attempts to evade a tax imposed by this chapter, or who intentionally aids or abets in the evasion or attempted evasion of such tax is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 21 287.33 Expenses of administration.
Expenses of administration of this chapter to be paid out of county funds include fees and expenses incurred by the county attorney in connection with this chapter and all other costs and expenses.
HIST: 1961 c 647 s 13; 1973 c 582 s 3; 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 11; 1999 c 31 s 22 287.34 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.35 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.36 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.37 Investigations and assessments.
The commissioner of revenue may investigate and examine persons and transactions that are subject to this chapter using the powers and authorities granted in chapters 270 and 289A.
The commissioner may
45
issue orders of assessment under chapter 289A, and enforce collection of unpaid tax or penalty amounts, including interest, under the authority of chapter 270.
All tax amounts collected by the commissioner must be apportioned under section 287.12.
The commissioner's expenses under this section are not expenses of administration under section 287.33.
All data and information made available to the commissioner under this section is public except for investigative data covered by section 270B.03, subd 6.
HIST: 1996 c 471 art 3 s 32 287.38 Limitations on time for assessment of tax.
Subd 1.
General rule.
Except in this section, the amount of this chapter must be assessed after the date the document is as otherwise provided taxes assessable under within 3-1/2 years recorded.
Subd. 4.
Additional assessments.
If a taxpayer is liable for additional taxes because of a redetermination by the commissioner of revenue, or for any other reason, the additional taxes bear interest from the time the tax should have been paid, without regard to any extension allowed, until the date the tax is paid.
Subd. 5.
Refunds.
(a) Interest must be paid at the rate specified in section 270.75 on an overpayment that is refunded or credited to a taxpayer more than 30 days after a refund request is made.
Interest does not apply to the 30-day period.
(b) In the case of an erroneous refund, interest accrues from the date the refund was paid unless the erroneous refund results from a mistake of the department of revenue or the county, then no interest or penalty is imposed unless the deficiency assessment is not satisfied within 60 days of the order.
Subd. 6.
Interest on judgments.
Notwithstanding section 549.09, if judgment is entered in favor of the commissioner of revenue or a county with regard to any tax under this chapter, the judgment bears interest at the rate specified in section 270.75 from the date the judgment is entered until the date of payment.
Subd. 7.
Interest on penalties.
A penalty imposed under this chapter bears interest from the date payment was required to be paid, including any extensions, to the date of payment of the penalty.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 24 287.39 Administrative review.
Subd 1.
Taxpayer right to reconsideration.
Under this section, a taxpayer may obtain reconsideration by the commissioner of revenue of: (1) an order of the commissioner assessing tax; (2) a denial by the commissioner of a request for abatement of penalty; or (3) a denial by the commissioner of a claim for refund of money paid to the commissioner as a result of an assessment or order issued by the commissioner under this chapter, by filing an administrative appeal as provided in subd 4.
A taxpayer cannot obtain reconsideration if the action taken by the commissioner of revenue is the outcome of an administrative appeal.
Subd. 2.
Omission in excess of 25 percent.
Additional taxes may be assessed within 6-1/2 years after the document was recorded, if the taxpayer underpays the tax due on the filing of that document by more than 25 percent or the document was erroneously treated as exempt.
Subd. 3.
Fraud.
Notwithstanding the limitations under subd 1, additional taxes may be assessed at any time if a document is presented for recording with a fraudulent intent to underpay the taxes imposed by this chapter.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 23 287.385 Interest.
Subd 1.
Interest rate.
If an interest assessment is required under this section, interest is computed at the rate specified in section 270.75.
Subd. 2.
Late payment.
If a tax is not paid within the time specified by law for payment, the unpaid tax bears interest from the date the tax should have been paid until the date the tax is paid.
Subd. 3.
Extensions.
If an extension of time for payment has been granted, interest must be paid from the date the payment should have been made if no extension had been granted, until the date the tax is paid.
46
Subd. 2.
Appeal by taxpayer.
A taxpayer who wishes to seek administrative review shall follow the procedure in subd 4.
Subd. 3.
Notice date.
For purposes of this section, "notice date" means the date of the order adjusting the tax or order denying a request for abatement or, in the case of a denied refund, the date of the notice of denial.
Subd. 4.
Time and content for administrative appeal.
Within 60 days after the notice date, the taxpayer shall file a written appeal with the commissioner of revenue.
The appeal need not be in any particular form, but must contain the following information: (1) name and address of the taxpayer; (2) if a corporation, the state of incorporation of the taxpayer, and the principal place of business of the corporation; (3) the Minnesota identification number or social security number of the taxpayer; (4) the type of tax involved; (5) the date; (6) the tax periods involved and the amount of tax involved for each period; (7) the findings in the notice that the taxpayer disputes; (8) a summary statement that the taxpayer relies on for each exception; and (9) the taxpayer's signature or the signature of the taxpayer's duly authorized agent.
Subd. 5.
Extensions.
If requested in writing and within the time allowed for filing an administrative appeal, the commissioner may extend the time for filing an appeal for a period of not more than 30 days from the expiration of the 60 days from the notice date.
Subd. 6.
Determination of appeal.
On the basis of applicable law and available information, the commissioner shall determine the validity, if any, in whole or part of the appeal and notify the taxpayer of the decision.
This notice must be in writing and contain the basis for the determination.
Subd. 7.
Agreement determining tax liability.
If the commissioner determines that it is in the best interests of the state, the commissioner may settle taxes, penalties, or interest that the commissioner has under consideration by virtue of an appeal filed under this section.
An agreement must be in writing and signed by the commissioner and the taxpayer or the
taxpayer's representative authorized by the taxpayer to enter into an agreement.
The agreement is final and conclusive and, except upon a showing of fraud or malfeasance, or misrepresentation of a material fact, the case shall not be reopened as to the matters agreed upon.
Subd. 8.
Appeal of an administrative determination.
Following the determination of an appeal and notwithstanding any period of limitations for making assessments or other determinations to the contrary, the commissioner shall issue an order reflecting that disposition.
If the statute of limitations for making assessments or other determinations would have expired before the issuance of this order, except for this section, the order is limited to issues or matters contained in the appealed determination.
The order is appealable to the Minnesota tax court under section 271.06.
Subd. 9.
Appeal where no determination.
If the commissioner does not make a determination within six months of the filing of an administrative appeal, the taxpayer may elect to appeal to tax court.
Subd. 10.
Exemption from Administrative Procedure Act.
This section is not subject to chapter 14.
HIST: 1999 c 31 s 25 287.misc2001 Minn.
Stats. repealed, etc. secs in chap 287 287.02 Repealed, 1987 c 268 art 14 s 25 287.06 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.07 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.09 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.32 Repealed, 1Sp1985 c 14 art 11 s 13 287.34 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26 287.35 Repealed, 1999 c 31 s 26
47
Revenue Notice # 01-05: Mortgage Registry Tax  Exemption for Mortgages that Secure Loans Made Under Qualifying Government Affordable Housing Programs Introduction This Revenue Notice addresses the mortgage registry tax exemption enacted by the 2001 Legislature for mortgages that secure loans made under qualifying affordable housing government programs.
The exemption is set forth in Minnesota Statutes section 287.04, clause (f), as follows: "The principle amount of a mortgage loan made under a low and moderate income or other affordable housing program, if the mortgagee is a 2.
federal, state, or local government agency."
There are two primary requirements for this exemption.
First, the loan must be authorized under a low and moderate income or other affordable housing program; and, second, the mortgagee must be a governmental entity.
Both of these criteria are to be evaluated as of the date that the mortgage is submitted for recording or registration.
Both requirements must be satisfied.
For example, under United States Code, title 12, section 1701q, the secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development may advance funds to a private non-profit organization to finance the construction of supportive-housing for very low income elderly persons.
If the non-profit organization uses the funds to make a construction loan that is secured by a mortgage, that mortgage would not be exempt under clause (f) even though the construction loan is being made under, and is being used for the purposes of, the cited federal statute.
The construction-loan mortgage in this example would not qualify for the exemption in clause (f) because the mortgagee is not a government agency.
Department Positions 1.
Generally In general, any mortgage loan given by the government for income-restricted housing will qualify for this exemption.
The borrower might be the current owner of the property, a prospective buyer or, a person who intends to develop the property.
Generally, income-restrictions are imposed with respect to the intended occupant(s) of the property.
However, some affordable housing programs do not have income restrictions.
Instead, the assistance provided by the program may only be used for housing that does not exceed the program's valuation limits.
Mortgages that secure loan given out under these types of programs will qualify for this exemption if the other requirements are satisfied.
Low and Moderate Income and Other Affordable Housing Programs For purposes of this exemption from the Minnesota mortgage registry tax, the phrase "mortgage loan made under a low and moderate income and other affordable housing program" includes, but is not limited to, loans made under any of the following programs, to the extent that repayment of the loan is secured by a mortgage on real estate that is located within Minnesota: a capital advance made under United States Code, title 12, section 1701q (HUD program; supportive housing for the elderly); a loan made under United States Code, title 12, section 1715z-1(s) (HUD program; rehabilitation of multifamily projects); a loan made under United States Code, title 42, section 1472 (HUD program; housing and buildings on adequate farms); a loan made under United States Code, title 42, section 1485 (HUD program; housing and related facilities for elderly persons and families or other persons and families of low income); a capital advance made under United States Code, title 42, section 1490b (HUD program; housing for rural trainees); a loan made under United States Code, title 42, section 1490d (HUD program; loans to nonprofit organizations to provide building sites for eligible families);
48
a loan made under United States Code, title 42, section 1490f (HUD program; loans for condominium housing in rural areas); a loan ma 462A.05, loans); a loan ma 462A.05, loans); de under Minnesota Statutes section subd 14 (MHFA program; rehabilitation de under Minnesota Statutes section subd 14a (MHFA program; rehabilitation
a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.209 (MHFA program; home ownership assistance); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.2093 (MHFA program; innovative and inclusionary housing program); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.21, subd 7 (MHFA program; energy efficiency loans); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.21, subd 8 (MHFA program; home ownership assistance fund); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.21, subd 8b (MHFA program; family rental housing); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.33 (MHFA program; economic development and housing challenge program); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 469.016 (regional, county or municipal housing and redevelopment authority program; low rent housing); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 469.017 (regional, county or municipal housing and redevelopment authority program; housing development projects); or, a loan made to meet the affordable housing goals negotiated under Minnesota Statutes section 473.254 (metropolitan council program; local housing incentives).
3.Federal, State or Local Government Agency (a) For purposes of this exemption from the Minnesota mortgage registry tax, federal agencies include, but are not limited to the following.
       Arrowhead Economic Opportunity Agency Farm Credit Banks Farmers Home Administration Farm Housing Assistance Federal Credit Unions Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation Federal Financing Bank
a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.05, subd 14d (MHFA program; accessibility loans); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.05, subd 18a (MHFA program; innovative housing loans); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.05, subd 36 (MHFA program; leasepurchase housing); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.05, subd 39 (MHFA program; equity takeout loans); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.07, subd 15 (MHFA program; urban Indian housing program); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.201 (MHFA program; housing trust fund loans for the development, construction, acquisition, preservation, and rehabilitation of lowincome rental and limited equity cooperative housing units); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.203 (MHFA program; housing preservation program); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.204 (MHFA program; family homeless prevention and assistance program); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.206 (MHFA program; community rehabilitation); a loan made under Minnesota Statutes section 462A.207 (MHFA program; mortgage foreclosure prevention and emergency rental assistance);
49
           
Federal Home Loan Bank Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation ("Freddie Mac") Federal Land Bank Associations Federal National Mortgage Association ("Fannie Mae") Federal Reserve Banks Government National Mortgage Association ("Ginnie Mae") National Consumer Cooperative Bank Resolution Trust Corporation Rural Housing Service Small Business Administration U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development U.S. Rural Utilities Service (RUS)
 
Riverview Economic Development Association Northeast Neighborhoods Development
4.
Required Documentation Documentation which identifies the specific housing program, and the specific government agency must be submitted with the mortgage.
This documentation may either be a statement incorporated into the body of the mortgage document, or a separate statement that is signed by an officer or delegate of the mortgagee governmental agency and attached to and recorded as a part of the mortgage.
5.
Effective date The exemption is effective for mortgages that are both acknowledged and recorded on or after August 1, 2001.
"Acknowledged" means that the mortgagor has signed a notarized statement appearing within the document stating that they caused the document to be prepared, and have signed it, for the purposes stated therein.
Jennifer L. Engh Assistant Commissioner for Tax Policy Publication Date: October 15, 2001
(b) For purposes of this exemption from the Minnesota mortgage registry tax, state agencies include, but are not limited to the following.
       Minnesota Agricultural Economic Development Board Minnesota Department of Trade and Economic Development Minnesota Housing Finance Agency Minnesota Rural Finance Authority Minnesota Valley Action Council Iron Range Resources and Rehabilitation Board Greater Minnesota Housing Fund
(c) For purposes of this exemption from the Minnesota mortgage registry tax, local government agencies include, but are not limited to the following.
            all 87 county governments all 854 city governments all 1,811 township governments city housing and redevelopment authorities county housing and redevelopment authorities multi-county housing authorities Mpls/St.
Paul Family Housing Fund Ramsey Action Programs, Inc.
Northside or Southside Neighborhood Housing Service Northeast Minnesota Housing Consortium Intercounty Community Council Community Neighborhood Housing Services
50
Revenue Notice #01-06: Mortgage Registry Tax  Exemption for Mortgages that Secure Qualifying Agricultural Loans Introduction A mortgage registry tax exemption was enacted in 2001 for mortgages securing loans that are used to acquire or improve certain types of agricultural real property.
This Revenue Notice provides guidance on the applicability of the exemption.
The exemption is set forth in Minnesota Statutes section 287.04, clause (i), as follows: an agricultural mortgage if the proceeds of the loan secured by the mortgage are used to acquire or improve real property classified under Minnesota Statutes section 273.13, subd 23, paragraph (a), or (b), clause (1), (2), or (3).
Department Positions 1.
Definition of Agricultural Mortgage For the purposes of this exemption, a mortgage is an agricultural mortgage to the extent that it secures a loan intended to be used to acquire or improve qualifying real property, and the qualifying real property is further intended to be used for the production of agricultural products as defined in Minnesota Statutes section 273.13, subd 23, paragraph (e).
Thus, if the intent of the loan is to finance the acquisition of qualifying real property that will be converted to a non-agricultural use, or if the proceeds are intended to be used to improve qualified real property in a way that converts its use to a non-agricultural use, the mortgage is not exempt.
Similarly, if the proceeds of a loan are used, or are intended to be used, to acquire or improve a house, a residential-use garage, or the immediately surrounding one acre of land, the mortgage will not be exempt, even if the house, garage and acre of land are part of an agricultural homestead.
2.
Definition of Acquire For the purpose of this exemption, a loan is used to acquire real property if the proceeds are used to purchase real property.
Loans used to finance the leasing of real property are not included in this definition.
3.
Definition of Improve A loan is used to improve real property to the extent that the proceeds of the loan are used to: (i) construct or improve buildings and fences used for agricultural purposes; or, (ii) improve the land itself by financing ditching, draining, grubbing, clearing, breaking, or any other necessary or useful improvement which is of permanent value to the land and which is related to preparing the land, or enhancing its utility, for the production of agricultural products.
Expenditures for both the involved labor, as well as any associated materials that are either consumed in the performance of the labor or permanently incorporated into the land, are included.
Improvements are betterments that change the character of real property by increasing its value, extending its useful life, or adapting it to a new use.
The exemption does not apply to mortgages that secure loans used to make repairs.
Repairs are work done to property to keep it in good order or maintain its current value.
4.
Definition of Real Property For purposes of this exemption, real property includes the land itself, and all buildings, structures, or fixtures on it.
Real property does not include tools, implements, machinery, or equipment attached to or installed in the real property, regardless or size, weight, or method of attachment.
Therefore, if the proceeds of a loan are used to acquire things that are not real property, things such as seeds, fertilizer, or farm implements, the associated mortgage is not exempt.
Similarly, if the proceeds of a loan are used to improve property that is not real property, such as when a loan is used to increase the capacity of a portable grain dryer, the associated mortgage is not exempt.
5.
Current Classification of Property Being Acquired or Improved For the purposes of this exemption, the acquired or improved real property must be classified under Minnesota Statutes section 273.13, subd 23, paragraph (a), or (b), clause (1), (2), or (3), at the time the mortgage is presented for recording.
Minnesota Statutes section 273.13, subd 23, paragraph (a), is the property tax classification
51
statute for homesteaded agricultural land and improvements.
Paragraph (b), clauses (1) and (2), are property tax classification provisions for timberlands; and, paragraph (b), clause (3), is the property tax classification provision for nonhomestead agricultural real property.
The most recent valuation notice for the property issued under Minnesota Statutes section 273.121 may be used to document the current classification of the property.
However, this method may not be used prior to the issuance of the valuation notice for the current assessment year if the classification of the property was changed for the current assessment year.
6.
Mixed-purpose and Re-financing Loans Mortgages that secure re-financing loans are entitled to the exemption if the proceeds from the re-financing loan are used to pay-off a prior loan that was used to improve or acquire qualifying real property.
Pro-ration of the exemption is required in cases where the mortgage secures a mixed-purpose loan.
If only a portion of the loan proceeds are used for exempt purposes, the tax applies to the remaining principal debt amount.
7.
Required Documentation The mortgagor or mortgagee, or both, must provide a signed statement to document the fact that they have claimed this exemption.
The statement may either be incorporated into the body of the mortgage or, the statement may be made in a separate document that is attached to, and recorded as a part of, the mortgage to which it relates.
8.
Effective Date The exemption is effective for mortgages that are both acknowledged and recorded on or after August 1, 2001.
For the purpose of this effective date, acknowledged means that the mortgagor has signed a notarized statement appearing within the mortgage stating that they caused the mortgage to be prepared, and have signed it, for the purposes stated therein.
Jennifer L. Engh Assistant Commissioner for Tax Policy Publication Date: October 29, 2001
52
Mortgage Registry Tax What's taxable, what's not--quick reference 1st/2nd Mortgages: Minnesota Property Only Securing Portion of Debt, Minnesota and Multistate 1st/2nd Mortgages: Property Across State Lines Supplemental Mortgages: Original Debt Increased Extension of a Mortgage: Original Debt Increased Assignment of a Mortgagor's Interest Assignment of Rents: First Mortgage Future Advance: Predetermined Lump Sum Future Advance: Revolving Line of Credit Future Advance: Undetermined Amount Mortgages Securing Bonds Mortgages with Deferred Interest Reverse Mortgages Mortgages from Ch. 7, 9, and 13 Bankruptcy Contract for Deed  Deed Tax when deed is filed Mortgage Amendments: Debt Not Increased Extension of a Mortgage: Debt Not Increased Assignment of a Mortgagee's Interest Assignment of Rents: Mortgage Amendment Mortgages from Divorce Decrees Future Advances: Property Protection Corrective Mortgages Replacement Mortgages Mortgages from Ch. 11 and 12 Bankruptcy Qualifying Agricultural Loans Qualifying Affordable Housing Loans  Lender a govt. entity Fraternal Benefit Society  Mortgagor (Borrower) Fraternal Benefit Society  Mortgagee (Lender) School: Charitable Organization: Religious Organization: M Cemetary Association: M Mortgagor or Mortgagee Mortgagor or Mortgagee ortgagor or Mortgagee ortgagor or Mortgagee Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Taxable T T T T axable axable axable axable
53
Federal Government and Agencies: Entity Acting as: Mortgagor(Borrower) Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Mortgagee(Lender) Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Exempt Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable Taxable
Commodity Credit Corporation Farm Credit Banks - Agri Bank(i.e. Farm Credit Bank of St. Paul) - AgAmerica Farm Credit Bank Farm Housing Assistance Farm Service Agency Federal Financing Bank Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation ("Freddie Mac") Federal National Mortgage Association ("Fannie Mae") Government National Mortgage Association ("Ginnie Mae") National Consumer Cooperative Bank Small Business Administration Federal Land Bank Associations -Ag Star Financial Services, FLCA -Ag Country Farm Credit Services, FLCA Federal Credit Unions Federal Deposit Ins.
Corporations Federal Reserve Banks Resolution Trust Corporations U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Dev.
U.S. Postal Service U.S. Rural Telephone Bank U.S. Rural Utility Service
